Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 1: Swami Sivananda — Kundalini Yoga

Access status: official free PDF/HTML from The Divine Life Society. Not treated here as public domain; use summary-first, minimal quotation. Divine Life Society describes the book as explaining the theory and illustrating the practice of Kundalini Yoga, with PDF and HTML versions available.

1. Source Identity

Source: Kundalini Yoga
Author: Sri Swami Sivananda
Institutional context: Divine Life Society, Rishikesh
Lineage type: modern synthetic yoga; Vedānta-inflected kundalini pedagogy
Primary axis: purification → discipline → subtle-body understanding → awakening → God-realization
Best use in Imaginarium: a “practical modern yogic map” of how rendered identity is purified, concentrated, energized, and reoriented toward realization.

This is not a medieval tantra manual. It is a 20th-century spiritual-yogic synthesis that translates kundalini, cakra, prāṇa, mantra, guru, discipline, and realization into a direct sādhana framework for aspirants.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Sivananda’s Kundalini Yoga belongs to modern synthetic kundalini-sādhana rather than classical Śākta Tantra or Vajrayāna tantra.

Its role in the larger yoga/tantra lineage:

Compared with The Serpent Power:
Avalon gives architecture and symbolic metaphysics; Sivananda gives aspirant-facing discipline.

Compared with Layayoga:
Goswami is technical and anatomical-subtle; Sivananda is devotional, ethical, practical, and integrative.

Compared with Vijñāna Bhairava:
Vijñāna Bhairava uses instant recognition through perception, shock, breath, void, and sensation; Sivananda emphasizes gradual purification and controlled ascent.

Compared with Mahānirvāṇa Tantra:
Mahānirvāṇa Tantra is ritual-theological and Śākta; Sivananda is pan-yogic and Vedāntic.

Compared with Vajrayāna sources:
Guhyasamāja, Hevajra, and Kālacakra use deity yoga, mandala, secrecy, and tantric Buddhahood architecture. Sivananda’s frame is simpler: awaken inner force, purify the vessel, unite Śakti with Śiva, realize the Divine.

3. Structural Map
Opening Frame

Defines kundalini as dormant spiritual power and frames the human body as a subtle spiritual field.

Subtle Body

Cakras, nāḍīs, prāṇa, suṣumṇā, kuṇḍalinī, granthis, and sahasrāra.

Yogic Disciplines

Āsana, prāṇāyāma, mudrā, bandha, concentration, mantra, purity, diet, brahmacarya, guru-disciple discipline.

Awakening and Ascent

The movement of Śakti through the subtle centres toward union with Śiva.

Signs, Obstacles, Warnings

Experiences, dangers, ego-inflation, imbalance, premature forcing, lack of purity.

Realization

Kundalini is ultimately subordinated to God-realization, liberation, and transformation of consciousness.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role in Blueprint
Definition of Kundalini	Establishes dormant divine power as the central metaphor
Cakra teaching	Maps consciousness into layered energetic-symbolic centres
Nāḍī / prāṇa teaching	Explains the energetic infrastructure of practice
Discipline sections	Show that awakening depends on ethical and bodily preparation
Mantra and concentration	Link sound, attention, and subtle activation
Warnings	Prevent romanticizing kundalini as spectacle
Realization frame	Converts energy-language into liberation-language
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Dormant Power

Kundalini as latent spiritual energy, coiled potential, hidden śakti.

Cluster B — Body as Sacred Circuit

Cakras, nāḍīs, suṣumṇā, prāṇa, and the vertical subtle axis.

Cluster C — Purification Before Power

Ethics, diet, chastity, steadiness, guru, humility, self-control.

Cluster D — Ascent and Union

Śakti rising toward Śiva; energy resolving into consciousness.

Cluster E — Signs and Dangers

Visions, bodily sensations, psychic phenomena, pride, imbalance.

Cluster F — Realization Beyond Phenomena

The goal is not occult experience but liberation, God-realization, and transformed being.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Coiled Power: Sivananda’s Kundalini as Latent Divinity
The Body as a Ladder of Worlds: Cakras, Nāḍīs, and the Vertical Human
Purify Before You Ascend: Why Sivananda Makes Ethics Energetic
Śakti Seeking Śiva: The Symbolism of Kundalini Ascent
The Danger of Spiritual Electricity: Signs, Obstacles, and Imbalance
Beyond Experiences: Kundalini Yoga as God-Realization
Sivananda and the Modern Yogic Imagination
From Rendered Ego to Radiant Axis: Kundalini and the Re-Rendering of the Self
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Because this is an official free text but not clearly public domain, use short quoted fragments only and mostly commentary/summation.

Target passage packs:

Definition of Kundalini Yoga
Description of cakras and suṣumṇā
Relationship between prāṇa and mind
Discipline/purity requirements
Warnings about forcing awakening
Union of Śakti and Śiva
Signs of awakening
Final aim: realization, not powers
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Coverage Strength	Notes
Kundalini as latent power	High	Central source theme
Cakra architecture	High	Strong practical summary
Nāḍī / prāṇa physiology	Medium-High	Less scholastic than Goswami
Mantra	Medium	Present but not as tantric-liturgical as Śākta sources
Ritual theology	Low	Not the main register
Śākta metaphysics	Medium	Śakti is central, but Vedāntic frame dominates
Warnings and safeguards	High	Very important source function
Phenomenology of perception	Medium	Less subtle than Vijñāna Bhairava
Liberation / realization	High	Final controlling frame
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as a gateway text: accessible, devotional, practical, and broad. It is ideal for introducing kundalini without drowning the reader in technical tantra.

Editorial danger: making it sound like a medieval tantric root-text. It is not. It is a modern yogic synthesis.

Best editorial angle:

Sivananda turns kundalini into a disciplined path of purification, concentration, and God-realization. Energy is not spectacle; it is the soul’s hidden verticality becoming conscious.

10. Variety Review

To avoid repetition with later sources:

Do not overuse:

cakra diagrams
serpent imagery
generic “energy rising” language
vague awakening language

Emphasize instead:

disciplined purification
modern pedagogy
synthesis of yoga and Vedānta
safety warnings
transformation over experience
inner power as responsibility
11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak or absent compared with other sources:

deep Śākta ritual theology
deity mantra liturgy
Kaula ritual symbolism
Vajrayāna deity yoga
nondual Śaiva micro-practice phenomenology
advanced scholastic subtle-body anatomy
historical-critical tantra studies

This source should therefore be paired later with The Serpent Power, Layayoga, and Vijñāna Bhairava.

12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Sivananda: What Is Kundalini?
The Six Centres and the Vertical Body
Purity, Brahmacarya, and the Ethics of Energy
Prāṇa, Mind, and the Control of Inner Movement
Warnings Against Premature Awakening
Śakti and Śiva as Inner Union
Why Powers Are Not the Goal
Kundalini as Re-Rendering: The Body Learns a New Axis
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Sivananda’s Kundalini Yoga is useful as the energetic purification model.

Ordinary consciousness is rendered through scattered prāṇa, desire, habit, and identification. Kundalini Yoga re-renders the person by:

gathering dispersed energy
purifying the body-mind vessel
converting sensation into attention
converting attention into ascent
converting ascent into union
converting union into realization

The core Imaginarium thesis:

The human being is not merely a thinking subject inside a body. The body itself is a vertical symbolic instrument, and consciousness can be re-rendered by purifying, concentrating, and awakening the forces latent within it.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 2: Arthur Avalon — The Serpent Power

Access status: public-domain scan / public-access OCR. Internet Archive lists a 1924 Digital Library of India scan and marks the rights as “In public domain.” It identifies the work as The Serpent Power, by Arthur Avalon, translating the Śat-Cakra-Nirūpaṇa and Pādukā-Pañcaka.

1. Source Identity

Source: The Serpent Power
Author/translator: Arthur Avalon, pen name of Sir John Woodroffe
Root texts: Śat-Cakra-Nirūpaṇa and Pādukā-Pañcaka
Tradition: Śākta Tantra / Laya Yoga / Kundalinī Yoga
Primary axis: subtle body → cakra symbolism → kuṇḍalinī ascent → Śakti-Śiva union
Best Imaginarium use: the technical architecture of the subtle-body rendering system.

Where Sivananda gives practical modern kundalini pedagogy, Avalon gives the symbolic machine: cakras, petals, bīja mantras, tattvas, deities, nāḍīs, suṣumṇā, and the metaphysics of latent power rising through the vertical human.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

The Serpent Power is the major English-language gateway into the cakra-kuṇḍalinī architecture of Śākta Tantra.

It should be placed as:

Not merely “energy work.”
It is a symbolic-metaphysical anatomy of consciousness.

Not merely physiology.
The cakras are not just bodily centres; they are layered world-principles, mantra-fields, deity-fields, and levels of manifestation.

Not merely mysticism.
Avalon’s presentation is technical, diagrammatic, Sanskritic, and scholastic.

Compared with Sivananda:
Sivananda = practice manual for aspirants.
Avalon = subtle-body sourcebook and symbolic grammar.

Compared with Layayoga:
Goswami expands the physiological-yogic system. Avalon preserves tantric symbolic density.

Compared with Vijñāna Bhairava:
Vijñāna Bhairava gives direct experiential entry-points; Avalon maps the inner mandala-body.

3. Structural Map
A. Long Introduction

Avalon explains Śakti, Tantra, mantra, cakras, kuṇḍalinī, yoga, and the logic of subtle embodiment.

B. Śat-Cakra-Nirūpaṇa

The six cakras are described in sequence, from mūlādhāra upward, culminating in sahasrāra.

C. Pādukā-Pañcaka

A shorter hymn-text on the guru’s feet / subtle lotus symbolism, linked to higher realization.

D. Commentary Apparatus

Avalon adds Sanskrit terms, explanatory notes, cross-references, and interpretive framing.

E. Visual Material

The plates and diagrams are crucial: they render the subtle body as symbolic architecture.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section	Function
Introduction to Śakti	Establishes reality as power-consciousness
Mantra theory	Shows sound as ontological force
Nāḍī system	Gives the energetic channels of the subtle body
Cakra descriptions	Maps consciousness into symbolic centres
Kuṇḍalinī doctrine	Explains latent Śakti and ascent
Śiva-Śakti union	Gives the metaphysical telos
Plates/diagrams	Converts doctrine into imaginal cartography
Commentary	Bridges Sanskrit tantra into English esoteric discourse
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Śakti as Ontological Power

Reality is not inert matter. It is dynamic power, manifestation, vibration, and consciousness-force.

Cluster B — The Body as Mandala

The body is not a container for the soul; it is a structured field of worlds, principles, sounds, deities, and levels of awareness.

Cluster C — Cakra Symbolism

Each cakra is a dense symbolic node: lotus, petals, letters, deity, element, colour, animal, mantra, and psychological-spiritual function.

Cluster D — Kuṇḍalinī Ascent

The coiled power rises through suṣumṇā, piercing centres and resolving manifestation back into consciousness.

Cluster E — Mantra and Letter-Body

Sanskrit letters are not decorative; they are subtle forces distributed through the lotus-body.

Cluster F — Śiva-Śakti Union

The end of ascent is not “having energy” but reunification of dynamic power with pure consciousness.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Body as a Hidden Scripture: Avalon’s Map of the Cakras
Śakti as the Power That Renders Worlds
The Lotus Machine: Petals, Letters, Deities, and Inner Architecture
Kuṇḍalinī and the Vertical Axis of Re-Rendering
Mantra as Subtle Code: The Letter-Body in Śākta Tantra
Mūlādhāra to Sahasrāra: The Ascent of Manifestation Back to Source
Avalon’s Great Translation: How Tantra Entered the Western Esoteric Imagination
The Serpent, the Spine, and the World-Tree of Consciousness
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Since the 1924 scan is marked public domain, short-to-moderate quotation is safer than with modern works, but still avoid overloading essays with long reproduced passages.

Target passage packs:

Avalon’s definition of the Serpent Power
Description of mūlādhāra and coiled kuṇḍalinī
Description of suṣumṇā and the nāḍīs
A cakra passage showing petals, letters, deity, element
Passage on mantra and sound-power
Passage on ascent through the centres
Passage on sahasrāra
Passage on Śakti and Śiva union
A diagram/plate reference for visual essay support
A commentary passage distinguishing gross and subtle body
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Cakra architecture	Very high	One of the central English sources
Kuṇḍalinī ascent	Very high	Core subject
Śākta metaphysics	High	Strong Śakti frame
Mantra theory	High	Especially letter-body symbolism
Ritual instruction	Medium	Present but not the best source for operational ritual
Laya Yoga	High	The work explicitly presents laya-yogic material
Practical safety	Medium	Less aspirant-pedagogical than Sivananda
Devotional tone	Medium	Present, but mediated by scholastic commentary
Western transmission	Very high	Key modern bridge text
Phenomenology of awareness	Medium	Less direct than Vijñāna Bhairava
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the subtle-body architecture manual of the yoga/tantra companion sequence.

The editorial danger is reducing it to simplified “chakra meanings.” That would flatten the source.

The correct framing:

Avalon’s The Serpent Power does not merely list chakras. It presents the human being as a vertical mandala in which sound, deity, element, power, and consciousness are arranged as an inner cosmology.

Use it to show that the subtle body is a rendering diagram: an imaginal-energetic model of how consciousness becomes world, body, speech, desire, thought, and liberation.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Sivananda:

Do not make this primarily about:

discipline
diet
general yogic aspiration
“how to awaken kundalini”
moral purification as the central theme

Make it about:

symbolic density
tantric anatomy
mantra-letters
cakra cosmology
Śakti metaphysics
the body as world-map
diagrams and plates as imaginal technology

The tone should be more architectural, scholarly, symbolic, and mandalic than Sivananda.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

This source is weaker for:

lived phenomenological micro-practices
direct awareness instructions
modern safety framing
comparative neuroscience
historical-critical tantra scholarship
Vajrayāna deity-yoga systems
embodied therapeutic adaptation

It should be paired with:

Sivananda for practical yogic discipline
Layayoga for systematic yogic physiology
Vijñāna Bhairava for immediate perceptual recognition
Mahānirvāṇa Tantra for ritual-theological Śākta framing
Kālacakra for macrocosm/microcosm cosmology
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
The Coiled Power at the Root
The Suṣumṇā as Axis of Re-Rendering
Lotus Petals as Letters of Reality
The Cakra as Elemental World-Node
Śakti as the Power of Manifestation
The Rise Through the Six Centres
Sahasrāra and the Return Beyond Manifestation
Avalon’s Diagrams as Tantric Interface Design
The Subtle Body as a Map of Rendered Consciousness
From Serpent to Crown: The Vertical Mandala of Liberation
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, The Serpent Power is the subtle-body cartography source.

Ordinary consciousness appears as a flat ego-world: body here, world there, mind inside, objects outside. Avalon’s tantric map breaks that flatness. The body becomes a layered cosmos. Speech becomes mantra. Sound becomes structure. Desire becomes Śakti. Attention becomes ascent. The spine becomes a world-axis.

Core Imaginarium thesis:

The human being is a rendered mandala. The cakras are not merely psychological symbols but imaginal interfaces where body, sound, element, deity, and consciousness meet. Kuṇḍalinī is the hidden power by which the rendered world can be traced back to its source.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 3: Shyam Sundar Goswami — Layayoga

Access status: freely hosted PDF, but likely copyrighted. Use summary-first and avoid extended quotation. The book was published in English by Inner Traditions/Simon & Schuster in 1999, and Google Books lists it as Layayoga: The Definitive Guide to the Chakras and Kundalini.

A free PDF is hosted by Theosophy World, but this should not be treated as public domain.
1. Source Identity

Source: Layayoga: The Definitive Guide to the Chakras and Kundalini
Author: Shyam Sundar Goswami
Tradition: Laya Yoga / Kundalini Yoga / subtle-body yoga
Primary axis: chakra-nāḍī physiology → concentration → dissolution → absorption into higher consciousness
Best Imaginarium use: the most systematic “subtle-body engineering” source in the sequence.

Goswami’s importance is that he treats chakras and nāḍīs not as vague symbolic tropes but as a rigorous yogic anatomy of transformation.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Layayoga sits between Haṭha Yoga, Kundalini Yoga, and Rāja Yoga. The Goswami Yoga Institute describes Layayoga as a chakra science, also called Kundalini Yoga, occupying a middle position between Haṭha and Rāja Yoga.

Compared with the other sources:

Sivananda: practical, devotional, synthetic pedagogy.
Goswami: technical, systematic, anatomical-subtle, chakra-by-chakra.

The Serpent Power: tantric symbolic architecture.
Goswami: yogic physiology and meditative mechanics.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct recognition through perception.
Goswami: gradual internalization through subtle centres.

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra: Śākta ritual theology.
Goswami: interior yogic dissolution.

Vajrayāna tantras: deity, mandala, initiation, secrecy.
Goswami: subtle-body concentration and absorption.

3. Structural Map
A. Foundations of Laya

Defines laya as dissolution, absorption, and retraction of mental-energy processes into deeper consciousness.

B. Subtle Body Framework

Maps chakras, nāḍīs, kuṇḍalinī, prāṇa, mantra, and concentration.

C. Chakra-by-Chakra System

Each centre is treated as a field with structure, symbolism, function, and meditative significance.

D. Descent / Spiritualization

Unlike common upward-only kundalini models, some descriptions of Layayoga emphasize starting from sahasrāra and spiritualizing the centres downward.

E. Integration

The system joins concentration, mantra, body, energy, symbol, and consciousness into a single yogic method.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Definition of laya	Establishes dissolution as the central process
Chakra analysis	Gives the main architecture
Nāḍī discussion	Explains subtle channels and energetic movement
Kuṇḍalinī doctrine	Links latent force with transformation
Mantra material	Shows sound as subtle activation
Concentration method	Connects subtle anatomy to meditative absorption
Comparative yoga framing	Places laya between body-discipline and mind-discipline
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Laya as Dissolution

The core term is not “power” but dissolution: the reabsorption of scattered mental-energy processes into subtler unity.

Cluster B — Chakra Physiology

Goswami gives one of the most systematic modern treatments of chakra structure, function, symbolism, and meditation.

Cluster C — Nāḍī Network

The body is rendered as an energetic circuitry of channels, not merely a gross physical organism.

Cluster D — Kuṇḍalinī and Consciousness

Kuṇḍalinī is not spectacle; it is the latent force of spiritual transformation within a disciplined yogic system.

Cluster E — Mantra and Concentration

Sound, attention, and inner form become instruments of subtle-body transformation.

Cluster F — Spiritualization of the Body

The aim is not escape from embodiment but the reordering of the psycho-energetic body by higher consciousness.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Laya: The Yoga of Dissolving the Rendered Self
Goswami’s Chakra Science: Beyond New Age Symbolism
Nāḍīs as Inner Pathways of Consciousness
The Body as Subtle Circuit: Layayoga and Yogic Physiology
Kundalini Without Spectacle: Goswami’s Technical Discipline
From Sahasrāra Downward: Spiritualizing the Centres
Mantra, Attention, and the Dissolution of Mind
Layayoga as Re-Rendering Through Subtle Absorption
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Because copyright is likely active, use reference packs, not extended quotations.

Target passage packs:

Opening definition of Layayoga
Explanation of laya as dissolution
General chakra system overview
Nāḍī and subtle-channel explanation
Kuṇḍalinī’s role in Layayoga
Sahasrāra and spiritual descent/ascent material
Mantra and concentration sections
Comparative comments on Haṭha, Rāja, and Kundalini Yoga
Any diagrammatic chakra material
Closing realization / absorption framing
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Chakra anatomy	Very high	Core value of the book
Nāḍī physiology	High	Strong subtle-body detail
Laya / dissolution	Very high	Defining principle
Kuṇḍalinī	High	Treated technically
Mantra	Medium-High	Important but not Śākta-liturgical
Practical yoga pedagogy	High	More systematic than poetic
Śākta theology	Medium	Present indirectly through kundalini framework
Ritual tantra	Low	Not the main mode
Vajrayāna mandala	Low	Different lineage
Imaginarium relevance	Very high	Excellent re-rendering model
9. Editorial Review

This source should be used as the technical subtle-body physiology source.

Editorial danger: treating it as another generic chakra book. It is better framed as:

Goswami gives the chakra system as a disciplined science of psycho-energetic dissolution, where the body is not merely interpreted symbolically but reorganized as a field of concentration, mantra, subtle force, and higher consciousness.

The source is especially useful for correcting shallow chakra language.

10. Variety Review

Avoid overlap with The Serpent Power by not making this mainly about tantric symbolism.

Emphasize instead:

physiological precision
laya as dissolution
chakra function, not just imagery
nāḍī mechanics
concentration and absorption
the body as technical yogic instrument
subtle anatomy as practice-map, not decorative mandala

Tone should be clinical, yogic, systematic, and engineering-like.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

direct nondual awareness phenomenology
poetic goddess devotion
Śākta ritual theology
Vajrayāna deity yoga
mythic cosmology
historical tantra criticism
imaginal deity language

Pair with:

Vijñāna Bhairava for direct perceptual recognition
Karpūrādi-Stotra for goddess-poetic imaginal intensity
Mahānirvāṇa Tantra for ritual-theological Śākta framing
Kālacakra Tantra for macrocosm/microcosm cosmology
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Laya as Dissolution of the Rendered Mind
The Chakra System as Technical Yogic Anatomy
Nāḍīs as Channels of Re-Rendering
Kundalini as Transformative Latency
Sahasrāra and the Spiritualization of the Centres
Mantra as Subtle-Body Code
Concentration as Energetic Reorganization
The Body as a Yogic Instrument of Absorption
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Layayoga is the dissolution-and-subtle-physiology source.

Ordinary consciousness is rendered through scattered attention, habitual sensation, emotional charge, and body-identification. Layayoga reverses this by making the body a field of ordered subtle attention.

Core Imaginarium thesis:

The rendered self dissolves not by rejecting the body, but by entering the body’s subtle architecture so deeply that its scattered energies are absorbed back into higher consciousness. Layayoga is the science of re-rendering through dissolution.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 4: Vijñāna Bhairava Tantra

Access status: public-access Sanskrit/English scans exist. Internet Archive lists one Sanskrit-English item with “CC0 1.0 Universal,” and another Sanskrit/Hindi edition with “Public Domain Mark 1.0.” Use these as access bases, but avoid relying heavily on modern copyrighted translations.

1. Source Identity

Source: Vijñāna Bhairava Tantra
Tradition: nondual Śaiva / Trika / Kashmir Śaivism
Form: dialogue between Devī and Bhairava
Core structure: 112 dhāraṇās, or contemplative entry-points
Primary axis: immediate recognition through perception, breath, shock, void, sound, sensation, and awareness
Best Imaginarium use: the micro-practice source for re-rendering perception itself.

This is not mainly a chakra manual, ritual text, or devotional hymn. It is a precise phenomenological tantra of attention.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Vijñāna Bhairava belongs to the nondual Śaiva stream, especially useful as a text of direct recognition through experience.

Compared with the other sources:

Sivananda: gradual purification and disciplined kundalini pedagogy.
Vijñāna Bhairava: immediate openings inside ordinary perception.

The Serpent Power: subtle-body architecture.
Vijñāna Bhairava: direct shifts in awareness.

Layayoga: dissolution through technical chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Vijñāna Bhairava: dissolution through breath, gap, intensity, void, sound, and sensation.

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra: Śākta ritual theology.
Vijñāna Bhairava: experiential nondual recognition.

Vajrayāna sources: mandala, deity yoga, secrecy, tantric Buddhahood.
Vijñāna Bhairava: awareness itself as the doorway.

3. Structural Map
A. Devī’s Question

Devī asks what Bhairava truly is beyond forms, mantras, ritual categories, and doctrinal appearances.

B. Bhairava’s Reply

Bhairava redirects the question from theology to direct entry into awareness.

C. The 112 Dhāraṇās

A sequence of contemplative gateways using breath, sound, space, fear, wonder, desire, perception, void, dream, sleep, body, sky, light, and inner stillness.

D. Nondual Recognition

The practices are not ends in themselves; they are doors into Bhairava-consciousness.

E. Closing Frame

The multiplicity of methods resolves into a single principle: awareness recognizes itself through any experience when grasping relaxes.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Devī’s question	Breaks dependence on outer categories
Bhairava’s teaching	Reorients practice toward direct recognition
Breath dhāraṇās	Use the gap between inhalation and exhalation
Sound dhāraṇās	Use vibration, mantra, resonance, and inner hearing
Void dhāraṇās	Use space, absence, darkness, and emptiness
Sensation dhāraṇās	Use embodied experience as doorway
Shock/intensity dhāraṇās	Use fear, wonder, desire, surprise, or rupture
Ordinary-life dhāraṇās	Make every perception a possible threshold
Final recognition	Shows Bhairava as the ground revealed through all methods
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — The Question Beyond Form

The text begins by destabilizing ritual and metaphysical certainties. What is Bhairava beyond names and methods?

Cluster B — Breath and the Gap

The pause, threshold, and interval become openings into nondual awareness.

Cluster C — Sound and Vibration

Sound is not merely mantra repetition; it is a doorway into subtle awareness and resonance.

Cluster D — Void, Space, Darkness

The absence of object becomes a positive field of recognition.

Cluster E — Sensation as Doorway

Embodied feeling, pleasure, pain, expansion, stillness, and intensity are used as entrances into awareness.

Cluster F — Shock and Wonder

Extreme or liminal states can interrupt the ordinary rendering of self/world.

Cluster G — Everyday Recognition

The text radically expands practice beyond formal ritual: any perception can become a gate.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Devī’s Question: What Is Bhairava Beyond All Forms?
The Gap in the Breath: Awareness at the Threshold
Shock, Wonder, and the Break in the Rendered World
Void as Doorway: Space, Darkness, and Objectless Awareness
The Sound That Opens: Mantra, Vibration, and Inner Resonance
Sensation as Revelation: The Body in Vijñāna Bhairava
Every Perception Is a Gate: The Nondual Genius of the 112 Dhāraṇās
Bhairava as Re-Rendering: Awareness Recognizing Itself Through Experience
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Use brief quotation only where the source version is clearly open. Prefer comparative summary across accessible editions.

Target passage packs:

Devī’s opening question
Bhairava’s shift from doctrine to recognition
Breath pause / inner gap passages
Sound and mantra passages
Void / sky / space passages
Shock, fear, wonder, or intensity passages
Sensory absorption passages
Dream, sleep, or liminal-state passages
Everyday perception as practice passages
Closing nondual recognition material
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Direct awareness	Very high	Core value of the text
Breath practice	High	Especially gap and threshold
Void / space	Very high	Central phenomenological doorway
Sound / mantra	High	More experiential than liturgical
Sensory immediacy	Very high	Body and perception become gateways
Shock / intensity	High	Important for Imaginarium
Cakra architecture	Low-Medium	Not the main register
Ritual theology	Low	The text often bypasses ritual categories
Śākta metaphysics	Medium	Devī-Bhairava polarity is present
Practical instruction	High conceptually	But should be framed non-operationally here
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the phenomenological tantra source.

Editorial danger: turning it into a casual “112 meditation hacks” book. The practices are not techniques for experience-hunting; they are interruptions of contracted perception.

Best framing:

Vijñāna Bhairava teaches that reality can be recognized at the exact point where ordinary rendering stutters: the breath-gap, the shock, the sound fading, the sky opening, the sensation intensifying, the object disappearing.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Sivananda, Avalon, and Goswami:

Do not center:

kundalini ascent
chakra anatomy
energy purification
subtle physiology
ritual doctrine

Emphasize:

immediacy
perception
gaps
thresholds
void
intensity
ordinary experience as doorway
awareness recognizing itself

Tone should be sharp, luminous, phenomenological, and direct.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

full chakra system
detailed nāḍī physiology
Śākta ritual theology
formal deity liturgy
Vajrayāna mandalic architecture
historical institutional lineage
ethical preparatory discipline

Pair with:

Sivananda for discipline and purification
The Serpent Power for cakra architecture
Layayoga for subtle physiology
Karpūrādi-Stotra for goddess-poetic intensity
Kālacakra for cosmic macro/micro mapping
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
The Question Beyond Doctrine
The Breath-Gap as Portal
The Vanishing Sound
The Sky and the Void
Shock as Recognition
Wonder as a Break in Rendering
Sensation Without Grasping
Dream, Sleep, and Liminal Consciousness
Ordinary Perception as Tantric Gate
Bhairava as Awareness Itself
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Vijñāna Bhairava is the direct perception-interruption source.

Ordinary consciousness renders a continuous world: “me here, object there, time moving, body located, thought narrating.” This text shows the weak points in that rendering:

the pause between breaths
the instant after shock
the fading of sound
the open sky
the edge of sleep
intense feeling before naming
the gap before thought lands

Core Imaginarium thesis:

The world-render is not broken only through long ascent or ritual transformation. It can flicker open in the smallest interval. Vijñāna Bhairava is the tantra of the threshold: awareness catching itself before the self-world hardens again.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 5: Mahānirvāṇa Tantra / Tantra of the Great Liberation

Access status: public-access / public-domain-style Avalon translation. Sacred Texts hosts the 1913 Arthur Avalon translation, and Internet Archive has a 1928 Digital Library of India scan marked “In Public Domain.”

1. Source Identity

Source: Mahānirvāṇa Tantra
English title: Tantra of the Great Liberation
Translator/editor: Arthur Avalon / Sir John Woodroffe
Tradition: Śākta Tantra
Form: dialogue between Śiva and Devī / Pārvatī
Primary axis: liberation through Śakti, mantra, kula, dharma, ritual order, and Brahman-realization
Best Imaginarium use: the ritual-theological Śākta source: how tantra renders cosmos, body, mantra, law, liberation, and goddess into one sacred order.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra is not primarily a cakra manual like The Serpent Power, nor a micro-practice text like Vijñāna Bhairava.

Its place is Śākta ritual theology and liberative order.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: modern yogic discipline.
Mahānirvāṇa: tantric dharma, mantra, ritual theology, and goddess-centered liberation.

The Serpent Power: subtle-body architecture.
Mahānirvāṇa: sacred social-cosmic order, initiation, mantra, worship, liberation.

Layayoga: dissolution through subtle-body concentration.
Mahānirvāṇa: liberation through Śākta metaphysics and ritualized life.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct awareness-gates.
Mahānirvāṇa: a fuller tantric world-order: deity, mantra, kula, Brahman, dharma, and rite.

3. Structural Map
A. Śiva-Devī Dialogue

The source opens in revelation mode: Devī questions, Śiva discloses the path suited to beings in the present age.

B. Brahman and Śakti

It gives a strongly theological-metaphysical frame where worship of deity is ultimately related to Brahman.

C. Mantra and Initiation

Mantra is not decoration; it is the sonic body of sacred transmission.

D. Kula and Ritual Order

The text lays out forms of worship, consecration, lineage, and ritual belonging.

E. Dharma and Social Regulation

Unlike purely interior yoga texts, this tantra also addresses conduct, duties, law, and social-religious order.

F. Liberation

Ritual and theology are ultimately subordinated to mahānirvāṇa: great liberation.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Devī’s question	Frames the need for a path adapted to the age
Śiva’s teaching	Establishes revealed tantric authority
Brahman doctrine	Prevents ritual from becoming merely external
Śakti theology	Places goddess-power at the centre of manifestation
Mantra teaching	Shows sound as consecrated power
Initiation / kula	Defines transmission, belonging, and lineage
Worship / pūjā	Ritualizes the body-world relationship
Dharma sections	Make tantra a full life-order, not only meditation
Liberation teaching	Returns ritual multiplicity to ultimate release
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Tantra as Revelation

The text frames tantra as disclosed knowledge, not invented technique.

Cluster B — Śakti and Brahman

Goddess, power, and ultimate reality are held together. Worship of form points toward the formless.

Cluster C — Mantra as Sacred Body

Mantra functions as living transmission, ritual identity, and metaphysical sound-form.

Cluster D — Kula and Belonging

The practitioner is not isolated; realization is embedded in lineage, family, initiatory relation, and sacred community.

Cluster E — Ritualized Cosmos

Rite, body, deity, offering, and world are linked into a consecrated order.

Cluster F — Dharma and Reformist Tone

The text is notable for combining tantric material with dharma, social law, and a more public/reformist register.

Cluster G — Great Liberation

The final axis is not ritual accumulation but liberation through recognition of ultimate reality.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Tantra of Great Liberation: Why Mahānirvāṇa Is Not Mere Ritual
Devī Asks, Śiva Reveals: Tantra as Dialogic Revelation
Śakti and Brahman: The Goddess as the Power of the Absolute
Mantra as Sacred Body: Sound, Transmission, and Liberation
Kula: The Esoteric Family as Spiritual World-Order
Ritualizing Reality: Pūjā as Re-Rendering the Body and Cosmos
Tantric Dharma: Why This Text Cares About Law and Conduct
Great Liberation: From Ritual Form to Formless Realization
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Because Avalon’s older translation is publicly accessible, use moderate excerpts carefully, but the companion should still lean on structured summary.

Target passage packs:

Devī’s opening question
Śiva’s declaration of the path for the age
Brahman / deity relation passage
Śakti as supreme power passage
Mantra initiation passage
Kula / lineage passage
Worship / offering passage
Dharma / conduct passage
Liberation / mahānirvāṇa passage
Passage where ritual form points beyond itself
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Śākta theology	Very high	Central source value
Ritual order	Very high	Major emphasis
Mantra	High	Mantra is integral
Kula / initiation	High	Key tantric social-spiritual structure
Liberation	High	Explicit final aim
Cakra architecture	Low-Medium	Not the main source for this
Kundalini ascent	Medium	Present in wider Śākta field, not central here
Direct phenomenology	Low	Less like Vijñāna Bhairava
Dharma/social order	Very high	Distinctive feature
Imaginarium use	High	Excellent for sacred-order rendering
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the Śākta ritual-theology and liberative-order text.

Editorial danger: reducing tantra either to “ritual weirdness” or to generic goddess devotion. The text is more interesting than both.

Best framing:

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra shows tantra as a total re-ordering of reality: deity, mantra, body, family, conduct, cosmos, law, and liberation are woven into one consecrated world.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with earlier sources:

Do not center:

chakra diagrams
kundalini ascent
subtle-body physiology
breath-gap practices
laya dissolution

Emphasize:

Śiva-Devī revelation
Śakti and Brahman
mantra as consecrated speech
kula as sacred belonging
ritual as world-ordering
dharma and social regulation
liberation through consecrated reality

Tone should be theological, structural, and world-ordering.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

detailed chakra mapping
nāḍī physiology
direct awareness phenomenology
micro-practice gateways
Buddhist deity yoga
Kālacakra cosmology
modern yogic safety pedagogy

Pair with:

The Serpent Power for subtle-body architecture
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct recognition
Karpūrādi-Stotra for goddess-poetic intensity
Shakti and Shâkta for Avalon’s interpretive explanation of Śākta metaphysics
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Devī’s Question and the Need for Tantra
Śiva’s Revelation of the Path
Śakti as Power of Brahman
Mantra as Consecrated Speech
Kula as Sacred Lineage-World
Pūjā as Re-Rendering the Cosmos
Tantric Dharma and the Ordering of Life
Great Liberation Beyond Ritual Form
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Mahānirvāṇa Tantra is the consecrated-world source.

Earlier sources re-render the body, energy, or perception. This source re-renders the whole field of life:

speech becomes mantra
body becomes ritual site
relationship becomes kula
deity becomes gateway to Brahman
conduct becomes sacred law
world becomes consecrated order
liberation becomes the telos of form itself

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra shows that tantra is not only an inner ascent or private experience. It is a complete re-rendering of reality into sacred order, where mantra, goddess, body, conduct, and liberation belong to one luminous structure.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 6: Arthur Avalon / Sir John Woodroffe — Shakti and Shâkta

Access status: public-domain-style / public-access early 20th-century text. Sacred Texts hosts Shakti and Shâkta in HTML with a full chapter index, and Internet Archive hosts a 1929 Digital Library of India scan.

1. Source Identity

Source: Shakti and Shâkta
Author: Sir John Woodroffe, writing as Arthur Avalon
Tradition: Śākta Tantra, interpreted through comparative philosophy, Vedānta, and modern apologetic exposition
Form: essays and addresses on Śākta doctrine and Tantra Śāstra
Primary axis: Śakti metaphysics → Tantra defence → consciousness-power → world as manifestation
Best Imaginarium use: the interpretive bridge text: how Śākta Tantra becomes philosophically legible as a metaphysics of power-consciousness.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Shakti and Shâkta is not a root tantra, not a practice manual, and not a cakra map. It is Avalon/Woodroffe explaining the philosophical world behind the tantras.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: practical kundalini sādhana.
Shakti and Shâkta: philosophical defence and exposition of Śākta metaphysics.

The Serpent Power: subtle-body architecture.
Shakti and Shâkta: metaphysical interpretation of Śakti, consciousness, māyā, power, matter, and manifestation.

Layayoga: technical chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Shakti and Shâkta: conceptual grammar for why subtle-body yoga makes sense in a Śākta universe.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct awareness micro-practices.
Shakti and Shâkta: doctrinal explanation of consciousness-power.

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra: Śākta ritual theology.
Shakti and Shâkta: modern explanatory bridge into Śākta Tantra as a worldview.

3. Structural Map
A. Indian Religion and Tantra Śāstra

Woodroffe frames Tantra within Indian religious life and argues against shallow dismissals of tantra.

B. Śakti: The World as Power

The key move: reality is understood as power, energy, potency, manifestation, and consciousness-force.

C. Tantra, Veda, and Śākta Religion

The text situates Śākta Tantra in relation to Brahmanical tradition rather than as a mere outsider cult.

D. Śakti and Śākta

Defines the relation between Power and the worshipper/knower of Power.

E. Comparative and Cross-Cultural Sections

Chapters touch China, Tibet, Taoism, and wider comparative religion.

F. Consciousness, Māyā, Matter

Later chapters develop Cit-Śakti, Māyā-Śakti, matter-consciousness relations, and Śākta nondualism. Sacred Texts’ chapter list explicitly includes “Cit-Shakti,” “Maya-Shakti,” “Matter and Consciousness,” “Shakti and Maya,” and “Shakta Advaitavada.”

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Defence of Tantra	Corrects colonial and moralizing misreadings
Śakti as Power	Establishes the metaphysical centre
Tantra and Veda	Places tantra inside Indian sacred tradition
Śākta worship	Explains goddess religion as metaphysics, not superstition
Cit-Śakti	Frames consciousness itself as power
Māyā-Śakti	Explains manifestation and psycho-physical appearance
Matter and consciousness	Bridges metaphysics and cosmology
Śākta Advaita	Gives nondual structure to goddess theology
Comparative chapters	Show Woodroffe’s broader interpretive project
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Tantra Misunderstood

Woodroffe’s core historical role is corrective: he tries to rescue Tantra from crude Orientalist dismissal and from sensationalism.

Cluster B — The World as Power

Śakti is not a metaphor. The world is power manifesting as form, matter, mind, body, desire, mantra, and cognition.

Cluster C — Consciousness as Dynamic

Cit is not passive witness only; in Śākta framing, consciousness has power, self-expression, and manifestation.

Cluster D — Māyā as Creative Power

Māyā is not merely illusion in a dismissive sense. It is also the power by which the One appears as world.

Cluster E — Śākta Nondualism

Goddess metaphysics becomes a nondual system: the world is not outside the Absolute but its power-expression.

Cluster F — Tantra as Worldview

Ritual, mantra, deity, subtle body, and liberation all depend on this deeper metaphysics of power.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The World as Power: Avalon’s Śākta Metaphysics
Why Tantra Had to Be Defended: Woodroffe Against Misreading
Śakti Is Not a Metaphor: Consciousness as Dynamic Force
Cit-Śakti: The Consciousness Aspect of the Universe
Māyā-Śakti: The Power That Renders the World
Matter and Consciousness in Śākta Tantra
Śākta Advaita: Nondualism Through the Goddess
Avalon as Bridge: How Tantra Became Philosophically Visible in English
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Because this is public-access and early 20th-century, moderate quotation may be possible, but still keep essays commentary-led.

Target passage packs:

“Śakti: The World as Power” chapter opening
Tantra Śāstra and Veda sections
Śakti and Śākta definition passages
“Is Śakti Force?” passages
Cit-Śakti passages
Māyā-Śakti passages
Matter and consciousness passages
Śakti and Māyā passages
Śākta Advaitavāda passages
Creation in nondual tantra passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Śākta metaphysics	Very high	Core value
Tantra defence	Very high	Major Woodroffe function
Śakti as power	Very high	Central thesis
Consciousness-power relation	High	Especially Cit-Śakti
Māyā / manifestation	High	Strong for Imaginarium
Ritual detail	Medium	Present conceptually, not main use
Cakra architecture	Low-Medium	Better handled by The Serpent Power
Practical kundalini	Low-Medium	Not primary
Direct phenomenology	Medium	Conceptual, not instruction-based
Comparative religion	Medium-High	Useful but should be used selectively
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the Śākta metaphysical bridge text.

Editorial danger: using it as if it were a tantra manual. It is better used to explain the worldview that makes tantric ritual, mantra, cakra, goddess, and embodiment coherent.

Best framing:

Woodroffe’s Shakti and Shâkta gives the metaphysics behind the tantric imagination: reality is not dead matter plus private mind, but living power-consciousness rendering itself as world.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Mahānirvāṇa Tantra:

Do not center:

ritual procedure
kula rules
dharma regulations
pūjā structure
liberation through ritual order

Emphasize:

metaphysics
philosophical defence
Śakti as power
consciousness and matter
māyā as rendering-force
nondual Śākta ontology
Woodroffe as interpreter

Tone should be conceptual, argumentative, explanatory, and bridge-building.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

detailed operational practice
full cakra system
breath/void micro-practices
poetic goddess invocation
Vajrayāna deity yoga
mandalic ritual architecture
historical-critical caution about Woodroffe’s interpretive lens

Pair with:

The Serpent Power for subtle-body architecture
Mahānirvāṇa Tantra for ritual-theological Śākta form
Karpūrādi-Stotra for goddess-poetic intensity
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct phenomenology
Kālacakra Tantra for macrocosm/microcosm cosmology
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
The World as Power
Tantra Against Misreading
Śakti and the Śākta
Is Śakti Force?
Cit-Śakti: Consciousness as Power
Māyā-Śakti: Rendering the World
Matter and Consciousness
Śākta Advaita
Creation in Nondual Tantra
Woodroffe as Interpreter of the Goddess
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Shakti and Shâkta is the power-metaphysics source.

It gives the theoretical bridge between mystical vision and ontology:

the world is not inert object
matter is not outside consciousness
consciousness is not merely passive witnessing
manifestation is power
māyā is rendering-force
goddess is the living principle of appearance
tantra is the art of entering reality as power-consciousness

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Shakti and Shâkta lets the Imaginarium say, with Śākta precision, that reality is not a dead scene being observed by a separate subject. Reality is power-consciousness rendering itself as world, body, symbol, mantra, matter, and liberation.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 7: Arthur Avalon — Hymn to Kālī / Karpūrādi-Stotra

Access status: public-access early Avalon text. Sacred Texts hosts the 1922 Hymn to Kali with full HTML sections, and Internet Archive hosts a 1953 scan marked CC0 1.0 Universal. Use cautiously: short quotations are fine from clearly open copies, but the blueprint should remain summary-led.

1. Source Identity

Source: Hymn to Kālī, also Karpūrādi-Stotra
Translator/commentarial frame: Arthur Avalon / Sir John Woodroffe, with traditional commentary material
Tradition: Śākta / Kaula Tantra
Form: short hymn of praise to Kālī, with dense mantra, deity-symbolism, poetic invocation, and tantric commentary
Primary axis: goddess invocation → mantra-poetry → fierce imagery → śakti-devotion → liberation through Kālī
Best Imaginarium use: the source for deity-language as imaginal intensity: how poetry, terror, beauty, mantra, and liberation fuse into one goddess-form.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Karpūrādi-Stotra is not mainly a systematic yoga manual, not a chakra anatomy text, and not a philosophical treatise. It is mantra-poetic Śākta invocation.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: practical modern kundalini discipline.
Karpūrādi-Stotra: fierce goddess devotion and mantra-poetic invocation.

The Serpent Power: subtle-body architecture.
Karpūrādi-Stotra: imaginal deity-language: Kālī as living symbolic force.

Layayoga: systematic subtle-body physiology.
Karpūrādi-Stotra: poetic compression, mantra, image, devotion, śakti.

Vijñāna Bhairava: micro-practices of direct awareness.
Karpūrādi-Stotra: goddess-form as an overwhelming imaginal doorway.

Mahānirvāṇa Tantra: Śākta ritual theology and dharma.
Karpūrādi-Stotra: concentrated hymn-form, fierce beauty, mantraic address.

Shakti and Shâkta: explains Śakti conceptually.
Karpūrādi-Stotra: invokes Śakti directly as Kālī.

3. Structural Map
A. Avalon’s Introduction

Frames the hymn within Śākta Tantra, Kaula devotion, mantra, and the symbolic meaning of Kālī.

B. The Hymn Proper

A compact sequence of verses addressing Kālī through mantraic, visual, devotional, and liberative language.

C. Commentary Layer

Explains Sanskrit terms, ritual-symbolic meanings, mantras, goddess epithets, and hidden theological implications.

D. Kālī as Imaginal Compression

The source condenses metaphysics into image: darkness, time, death, power, freedom, mother, terror, compassion, and liberation.

E. Devotion and Liberation

The hymn’s force is not literary only. Praise becomes a way of entering the goddess’s reality.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Introduction	Places the hymn within Śākta/Kaula Tantra
First verses	Establish Kālī as invoked power and mantra-body
Mantric names	Convert goddess into sound-form
Fierce imagery	Break ordinary sentimental deity-language
Symbolic body	Makes the goddess an imaginal map of power
Commentary	Opens hidden tantric meanings
Devotional address	Turns doctrine into relation
Liberative frame	Shows Kālī as terrifying and freeing, not merely destructive
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Kālī as Fierce Śakti

Kālī is not simply a frightening goddess. She is the power that cuts through false stability, egoic prettiness, and time-bound identity.

Cluster B — Mantra as Deity-Body

The hymn shows mantra not as verbal decoration but as a sonic form of the goddess.

Cluster C — Poetic Compression

Unlike systematic texts, this source condenses vast metaphysics into short, charged images.

Cluster D — Terror and Beauty

Kālī’s imaginal force depends on refusing tame spirituality. She is terrible because she reveals what the ego cannot domesticate.

Cluster E — Devotion as Entry

The devotee does not merely analyze Kālī. The hymn addresses her, praises her, and enters relation with her.

Cluster F — Liberation Through the Fierce Mother

Kālī’s darkness is not nihilism; it is the womb and void of liberation, beyond ordinary form.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Hymn as Portal: Why Karpūrādi-Stotra Is Not Just Praise
Kālī as Fierce Śakti: Terror, Time, and Liberation
Mantra as Goddess-Body: Sound, Name, and Power
The Beauty of the Terrible: Kālī’s Imaginal Language
Poetry as Tantra: How the Hymn Compresses Doctrine into Image
Devotion Without Sentimentality: Addressing the Dark Mother
Avalon’s Commentary and the Translation of Śākta Symbolism
Kālī and Re-Rendering: When the Ego’s World Cannot Survive the Goddess
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Target passage packs:

Avalon’s introductory framing of the hymn
Opening invocation to Kālī
Mantra-name passages
Verses with fierce visual imagery
Commentary on Kālī’s form
Commentary on mantra meaning
Verses linking devotion to power or liberation
Passages connecting Kālī with time, death, or transcendence
Passages showing motherly or compassionate aspects
Closing devotional/liberative frame
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Kālī devotion	Very high	Core source value
Mantra-poetry	Very high	Central form
Fierce goddess imagery	Very high	Essential but treat academically
Śākta metaphysics	High	Compressed into symbolic language
Kaula context	High	Important background
Cakra architecture	Low	Not the main source
Nāḍī physiology	Low	Better handled elsewhere
Ritual instruction	Medium	Present in commentary context, but avoid operationalizing
Direct phenomenology	Medium	Through image/devotion rather than micro-practice
Imaginarium use	Very high	Excellent deity-imagination source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the goddess-poetic imaginal source.

Editorial danger: flattening Kālī into either “dark aesthetic” or generic “divine feminine.” Both are weak.

Best framing:

Karpūrādi-Stotra shows how tantric language invokes a deity who is not merely believed in but imaginatively entered: Kālī is mantra, terror, mother, void, time, power, and liberating darkness.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Shakti and Shâkta:

Do not make this mainly conceptual metaphysics.

Emphasize:

poetic address
goddess-image
mantra as body
terrifying beauty
devotional intensity
imaginal compression
Kālī as rupture of ordinary rendering

Tone should be vivid, fierce, reverent, literary, and symbolic.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

systematic chakra anatomy
laya dissolution mechanics
nondual micro-practices
extensive ritual theology
Vajrayāna mandala/deity-yoga architecture
cosmological macro/micro systems
modern practical safety framing

Pair with:

Shakti and Shâkta for Śākta metaphysical explanation
Mahānirvāṇa Tantra for ritual-theological order
The Serpent Power for subtle-body architecture
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct awareness thresholds
Hevajra Tantra for fierce deity symbolism in Vajrayāna comparison
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Kālī as Mantra-Body
The Terrible Beauty of Śakti
Poetry as Tantric Compression
The Dark Mother and the End of Egoic Form
Avalon’s Commentary on Goddess Symbolism
Name, Sound, and Deity-Presence
Kālī as Time and Liberation
Devotion as Imaginal Entry
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Karpūrādi-Stotra is the fierce deity-imagination source.

Earlier sources re-render through discipline, subtle-body architecture, dissolution, direct awareness, ritual order, and metaphysics. This source re-renders through charged imaginal address:

name becomes presence
mantra becomes body
terror becomes revelation
darkness becomes womb
goddess becomes the form of what cannot be domesticated
devotion becomes entrance into symbolic reality
the ego’s world collapses before fierce śakti

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Karpūrādi-Stotra shows that imagination is not fantasy when consecrated by mantra, symbol, and devotion. Kālī is the imaginal form of reality’s power to dissolve false worlds and reveal liberation through the terrible beauty of the Goddess.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 8: Guhyasamāja Tantra / Tathāgataguhyaka

Access status: public-domain / public-access Sanskrit scans exist. Internet Archive hosts the 1931 Benoytosh Bhattacharyya edition, Guhyasamāja Tantra or Tathāgataguhyaka, from the Digital Library of India, and also full OCR text.

A modern 84000 entry for Toh 442 exists, but its translation is listed as not yet published.
1. Source Identity

Source: Guhyasamāja Tantra
Alternate title: Tathāgataguhyaka, “The Secret of the Tathāgata”
Tradition: Buddhist Vajrayāna / Unexcelled Yoga Tantra
Canonical location: Tibetan Kangyur, Toh 442
Primary axis: secrecy → mandala → deity yoga → gnosis → tantric Buddhahood
Best Imaginarium use: the source for Vajrayāna as a full mandalic re-rendering of body, speech, mind, cosmos, and awakening.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Guhyasamāja is not a yoga manual, not Śākta goddess tantra, and not a subtle-body source in the same register as The Serpent Power. It is a Buddhist tantric architecture of secrecy, deity, mandala, and awakening.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: individual yogic purification and kundalini discipline.
Guhyasamāja: tantric Buddhahood through deity-mandala transformation.

The Serpent Power: Śākta subtle-body ascent.
Guhyasamāja: Buddhist mandalic gnosis and transformation of body, speech, and mind.

Layayoga: technical chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Guhyasamāja: initiatory symbolic world-system.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct Śaiva recognition in perception.
Guhyasamāja: constructed tantric universe where perception is ritually and imaginally transformed.

Mahānirvāṇa / Shakti and Shâkta / Kālī hymn: Śākta power, goddess, ritual theology.
Guhyasamāja: Buddha-family, vajra-body, secrecy, and enlightenment architecture.

3. Structural Map
A. Root Tantra Frame

The text presents itself as a revelatory tantric discourse of the Buddha in esoteric mode.

B. Secrecy and Transmission

The “secret” is not simply hidden information; it marks the gap between ordinary conceptual mind and mandalic gnosis.

C. Mandala Architecture

The practitioner’s world is reconfigured through deity-palace, Buddha-family symbolism, and sacred geometry.

D. Deity Yoga

Identity is re-rendered through awakened form rather than ordinary ego-form.

E. Body, Speech, Mind Transformation

Vajrayāna works by consecrating the entire psycho-physical complex into enlightened body, mantra-speech, and gnosis-mind.

F. Completion-Stage Horizon

Later Guhyasamāja traditions become central for subtle-body completion-stage systems, especially in Tibetan interpretation.

G. Commentarial Lineages

The text becomes a major foundation for scholastic-practical interpretation in India and Tibet, especially Ārya and Jñānapāda traditions.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Esoteric Buddha discourse	Establishes tantric revelatory authority
Secrecy language	Marks transformation beyond ordinary conceptual access
Mandala presentation	Re-renders cosmos as awakened palace-field
Deity identity	Replaces ordinary self-image with enlightened form
Mantra / vajra speech	Reconfigures speech as awakened vibration
Wisdom-method symbolism	Frames union of gnosis and compassionate activity
Completion-stage implications	Opens later subtle-body and yogic readings
Commentarial tradition	Makes the tantra a master-key for Vajrayāna systems
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Secrecy as Ontological Shift

“Secret” does not just mean concealed. It means inaccessible to ordinary egoic rendering until perception, body, speech, and mind are transformed.

Cluster B — Mandala as World-Engine

The mandala is not decoration. It is a rebuilt world: ordered, luminous, deity-filled, and awakened.

Cluster C — Deity as Re-Rendered Identity

The practitioner does not merely worship a deity externally. The tantric field converts identity into awakened symbolic form.

Cluster D — Vajra Body, Speech, Mind

The ordinary human stack is re-coded: body as deity-form, speech as mantra, mind as gnosis.

Cluster E — Gnosis and Skillful Means

Buddhist tantra binds emptiness-wisdom to compassionate method, refusing both nihilistic emptiness and egoic power.

Cluster F — Lineage and Commentary

The tantra’s importance lies not only in the root text but in the huge interpretive systems built around it.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Secret Assembly: Why Guhyasamāja Is a Tantra of Re-Rendered Reality
Mandala as World-Engine: How Vajrayāna Rebuilds Perception
Deity Yoga and the End of Ordinary Identity
Vajra Body, Vajra Speech, Vajra Mind
Secrecy Is Not Hiding: Esoteric Knowledge as Ontological Shift
Guhyasamāja and the Architecture of Tantric Buddhahood
From Śūnyatā to Mandala: Emptiness as Constructive Imagination
The Imaginarium of the Buddha-Body: Why the World Must Be Re-Consecrated
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Use Sanskrit/public-domain scans for reference. Avoid long quotation unless using clearly public-domain materials. For modern translations or commentaries, use summary only.

Target passage packs:

Opening revelatory frame
Secrecy / “guhya” passages
Mandala description passages
Deity identity passages
Vajra body/speech/mind passages
Mantra / dhāraṇī / speech passages
Wisdom-method symbolism passages
Completion-stage relevant passages
Commentarial tradition overview
Closing Buddhahood / realization material
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Vajrayāna secrecy	Very high	Core source identity
Mandala architecture	Very high	Essential
Deity yoga	Very high	Central interpretive use
Body/speech/mind transformation	High	Key Vajrayāna axis
Buddhist gnosis	High	Emptiness and awakened knowing
Subtle-body completion stage	Medium-High	Strong in later tradition
Cakra physiology	Medium	Not like Śākta chakra manuals
Śākta goddess theology	Low	Different lineage
Direct awareness micro-practice	Medium	Present indirectly through tantric gnosis
Imaginarium use	Very high	Excellent mandalic re-rendering source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the Vajrayāna mandalic architecture source.

Editorial danger: turning it into exotic ritual spectacle or collapsing it into generic “visualization.” The mandala is not fantasy decoration; it is a complete reconstitution of reality under awakened signs.

Best framing:

Guhyasamāja shows Vajrayāna as radical re-rendering: ordinary identity, speech, space, embodiment, and world are replaced by deity-form, mantra, mandala, vajra-body, and gnosis.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Śākta sources:

Do not center:

kuṇḍalinī serpent ascent
Śakti metaphysics
Kālī devotion
Śiva-Śakti union
chakra petals and Sanskrit letters as in Avalon

Emphasize:

secrecy
Buddha-body
mandala
deity-yoga identity
vajra speech
emptiness and gnosis
tantric Buddhahood
lineage commentary

Tone should be mandalic, esoteric, Buddhist, architectural, and ontological.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

accessible practical yoga pedagogy
modern safety warnings
Śākta goddess metaphysics
poetic devotional deity-language
direct simple awareness instructions
public-domain English translation reliability
non-initiatory readability

Pair with:

Hevajra Tantra for Yoginītantra and fierce Buddhist symbolic intensity
Kālacakra Tantra for cosmology/time/macrocosm mapping
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct perceptual micro-practice
The Serpent Power for Hindu subtle-body architecture
Shakti and Shâkta for power-metaphysics contrast
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Guhya: What Makes the Tantra Secret
Mandala as Awakened World-Architecture
Deity Yoga and Re-Rendered Identity
Vajra Body, Speech, and Mind
Buddha-Family Symbolism
Emptiness as Mandalic Construction
The Ārya and Jñānapāda Interpretive Streams
The Secret Assembly as Imaginarium Technology
Completion Stage and Subtle Transformation
Tantric Buddhahood as World-Reconstruction
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Guhyasamāja Tantra is the mandalic identity-reconstruction source.

Earlier sources re-render through energy, subtle body, dissolution, awareness, Śākta ritual order, or goddess invocation. Guhyasamāja re-renders through Buddhist tantric world-construction:

body becomes vajra-body
speech becomes mantra
mind becomes gnosis
space becomes mandala
identity becomes deity-form
secrecy becomes transformed access
emptiness becomes the ground of symbolic reconstruction

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Guhyasamāja shows that Vajrayāna is not escapism or fantasy. It is a disciplined mandalic replacement of ordinary self-world rendering with awakened body, speech, mind, and space. The secret is not hidden information; it is the transformed mode of seeing in which the world appears as Buddha-field.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 9: Hevajra Tantra

Access status: official free/open-access 84000 translation available for Toh 419, published in the 84000 Reading Room under “Unexcelled Yoga Tantras.” Use summary-first, light quotation only. Internet Archive also hosts Snellgrove’s 1971 Sanskrit/Tibetan text volume as a controlled/in-library scan, but not as a clean public-domain English translation.

1. Source Identity

Source: Hevajra Tantra
Full Sanskrit-style title: Śrī-Hevajra-Ḍākinījāla-Saṃvara-Tantra
Tradition: Buddhist Vajrayāna / Yoginītantra / Mother Tantra
Canonical location: Tibetan Kangyur, Toh 419
Primary axis: fierce deity symbolism → yoginī/ḍākinī mandala → emptiness-bliss → subtle body → tantric Buddhahood
Best Imaginarium use: the source for Vajrayāna’s fierce imaginal re-rendering of desire, body, death-symbolism, deity, and emptiness.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Hevajra Tantra belongs to the Yoginītantra / Mother Tantra class. Rigpa Wiki describes it as especially important in Sakya and Kagyü contexts, and notes its emphasis on completion phase compared with Guhyasamāja, which is often associated more with generation phase.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: disciplined kundalini purification.
Hevajra: tantric transformation of identity through fierce deity, mandala, and gnosis.

The Serpent Power: Śākta subtle-body ascent.
Hevajra: Buddhist deity-mandala and emptiness-bliss symbolism.

Layayoga: technical chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Hevajra: subtle-body completion logic within a Vajrayāna symbolic universe.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct Śaiva awareness-thresholds.
Hevajra: ritual-imaginal transformation through deity, yoginī, and mandalic gnosis.

Guhyasamāja: secrecy and mandalic Buddhahood architecture.
Hevajra: fiercer, yoginī-centered, more symbolic-intense transformation of desire, embodiment, and emptiness.

3. Structural Map
A. Tantric Revelation Frame

The text unfolds as an esoteric Buddhist tantra where ordinary Buddhist doctrine is intensified through mandala, deity, mantra, and symbolic reversal.

B. Hevajra as Deity-Form

Hevajra is not merely an object of worship. He is a re-rendered awakened identity: wrathful, blissful, empty, and symbolic.

C. Yoginī / Ḍākinī Field

The tantra’s world is populated by yoginīs and ḍākinīs as powers of gnosis, liminality, embodiment, and transmission.

D. Mandala and Ritual Imagination

The mandala reorganizes space into awakened geometry, deity relationship, and ritual cognition.

E. Emptiness-Bliss Symbolism

The text repeatedly binds fierce or ecstatic imagery to Buddhist emptiness, preventing the symbols from becoming mere sensualism or spectacle.

F. Subtle Body and Completion-Stage Horizon

Later Hevajra systems strongly develop completion-stage readings involving inner channels, winds, drops, and gnosis.

G. Sakya / Vajrayāna Lineage Importance

The source becomes foundational in major Tibetan transmissions, especially Sakya.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Esoteric revelation	Establishes tantric authority
Deity presentation	Replaces ordinary self-image with awakened form
Yoginī / ḍākinī material	Opens the feminine/liminal field of tantric gnosis
Mandala sections	Rebuild space as awakened order
Mantra material	Re-renders speech as vajra speech
Symbolic reversals	Transform taboo, fear, desire, and death-signs into gnosis-symbols
Completion-stage implications	Link imagery to subtle-body transformation
Buddhahood frame	Keeps the goal as awakening, not power or spectacle
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Fierce Deity as Re-Rendered Identity

Hevajra is awakened identity in wrathful-symbolic form. The fierce image breaks ordinary egoic self-presentation.

Cluster B — Yoginī and Ḍākinī Gnosis

The yoginī field represents liminal wisdom, embodied gnosis, and the non-domesticated intelligence of tantra.

Cluster C — Mandala as Awakened Space

The mandala is a world-engine: it replaces ordinary space with sacred relational geometry.

Cluster D — Emptiness-Bliss

The tantra’s ecstatic language must be read through śūnyatā. Bliss is not ordinary indulgence; it is symbolic of nondual gnosis.

Cluster E — Symbolic Reversal

Fierce, shocking, or transgressive imagery functions as a reversal of conventional perception. Treat this academically and non-operationally.

Cluster F — Subtle Body Completion

The Hevajra lineage becomes crucial for subtle-body yogas of channels, winds, drops, and gnosis-body.

Cluster G — Sakya Lineage Significance

Hevajra becomes one of the core tantric sources in Sakya transmission and scholastic-practical synthesis.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Hevajra and the Fierce Re-Rendering of Identity
The Yoginī Field: Ḍākinīs, Liminal Wisdom, and Vajrayāna Imagination
Mandala as Awakened Space in the Hevajra Tantra
Emptiness-Bliss: Why Hevajra Is Not Hedonism
Wrathful Beauty: Fierce Deity Symbolism and the Break in Ordinary Perception
Symbolic Reversal: How Vajrayāna Transforms What the Ego Rejects
Hevajra, Subtle Body, and Completion-Stage Gnosis
Sakya’s Hevajra: Lineage, Commentary, and Tantric Buddhahood
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Use the official 84000 translation for summary and light quotation. Use older Sanskrit/Tibetan scans as reference support only.

Target passage packs:

Opening revelation frame
Hevajra deity description
Yoginī / ḍākinī passages
Mandala arrangement passages
Mantra / vajra speech passages
Emptiness-bliss teaching passages
Symbolic reversal passages
Subtle-body / completion-stage relevant sections
Lineage or colophon material
Closing Buddhahood / realization material
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Fierce deity symbolism	Very high	Central source value
Yoginī / ḍākinī field	Very high	Distinctive Hevajra strength
Mandala architecture	High	Strong Vajrayāna structure
Emptiness-bliss	Very high	Core interpretive key
Subtle-body completion	High	Especially in later tradition
Sakya lineage relevance	Very high	Major transmission importance
Śākta goddess theology	Low	Different tradition, though comparative openings exist
Chakra ascent	Medium	Present through Vajrayāna subtle body, not Avalon-style
Direct awareness micro-practice	Medium	Indirect through deity/mandala/gnosis
Imaginarium relevance	Very high	Excellent fierce-symbolic transformation source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the fierce Vajrayāna yoginītantra source.

Editorial danger: either sanitizing the fierce material into bland “Buddhist visualization,” or sensationalizing it as transgression. Both miss the point.

Best framing:

Hevajra Tantra shows how Vajrayāna re-renders the rejected edges of experience — fear, desire, death, intensity, body, and liminality — into a mandala of emptiness-bliss and awakened identity.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Guhyasamāja:

Do not make this merely another mandala/deity-yoga overview.

Emphasize:

yoginītantra identity
ḍākinī field
fierce imagery
emptiness-bliss
symbolic reversal
subtle-body completion
Sakya lineage role
transformation of intensity

Tone should be fierce, symbolic, non-sensational, Buddhist, and imaginal.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

accessible modern practice guidance
plain ethical preparation
Śākta power-metaphysics
Kālī-style devotional poetry
detailed Hindu cakra-petal architecture
direct, simple perceptual micro-practice
public-domain English translation base

Pair with:

Guhyasamāja Tantra for mandalic secrecy and tantric Buddhahood architecture
Kālacakra Tantra for cosmology, time, and macro/micro correspondence
Karpūrādi-Stotra for fierce goddess-poetic comparison
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct awareness thresholds
The Serpent Power for Hindu subtle-body contrast
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Hevajra as Fierce Awakened Identity
The Yoginī / Ḍākinī Field
Mandala as Liminal World-Engine
Emptiness-Bliss and the Transformation of Desire
Symbolic Reversal Without Sensationalism
Wrathful Form as Compassionate Gnosis
Subtle Body in Hevajra Completion Traditions
Sakya Hevajra and Tantric Lineage Architecture
Fierce Beauty and the Re-Rendering of Fear
Hevajra as Vajrayāna Imaginarium Technology
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Hevajra Tantra is the fierce symbolic-transformation source.

Earlier sources re-render through discipline, cakra architecture, dissolution, direct perception, Śākta metaphysics, goddess poetry, or mandalic secrecy. Hevajra adds the fierce Vajrayāna insight that the very materials ordinary consciousness rejects can be transformed:

fear becomes gate
desire becomes gnosis-symbol
body becomes deity-body
speech becomes mantra
space becomes mandala
liminality becomes ḍākinī-field
emptiness becomes blissful appearance
identity becomes Hevajra-form

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Hevajra Tantra shows that the imaginal realm is not only luminous, orderly, or serene. It is also fierce, liminal, and disruptive. Vajrayāna does not escape the charged materials of embodiment; it re-renders them inside emptiness-bliss, mandala, deity, and gnosis.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 10: Kālacakra Tantra / The Essence of the Higher Tantra of Kālacakra

Access status: official free/open-access 84000 translation for Toh 363. Internet Archive also hosts Sanskrit/source-material scans, including a 1966 Sanskrit collection marked Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0, and a 1985 critical edition scan. Use 84000 for summary-led English access, and avoid heavy quotation.

1. Source Identity

Source: The Essence of the Higher Tantra of Kālacakra
Tradition: Buddhist Vajrayāna / Kālacakra system / Unexcelled Yoga Tantra
Canonical location: Tibetan Kangyur, Toh 363
Primary axis: time → cosmos → subtle body → initiation-world → Shambhala → Buddhahood
Best Imaginarium use: the macrocosm/microcosm source: how time, body, cosmos, history, astrology, and awakening mirror each other.

Kālacakra means “Wheel of Time.” This source is not merely another deity-yoga tantra. It is the great tantric architecture of temporal reality: outer cosmos, inner body, and alternative enlightened order.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Kālacakra Tantra belongs to the Vajrayāna tantric universe, but its distinctive place is cosmological and temporal.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: modern kundalini practice and purification.
Kālacakra: cosmic time, subtle body, initiation, and enlightened civilization.

The Serpent Power: vertical Śākta subtle-body ascent.
Kālacakra: macrocosm/microcosm correlation: planets, body, breath, time, and awakening.

Layayoga: technical chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Kālacakra: subtle body embedded in cosmic cycles and tantric cosmology.

Vijñāna Bhairava: immediate recognition in perception-gaps.
Kālacakra: vast symbolic system of time, history, body, cosmos, and Buddhahood.

Guhyasamāja: secrecy and mandalic Buddhahood architecture.
Kālacakra: mandala plus cosmic time, Shambhala mythos, and world-order transformation.

Hevajra: fierce yoginītantra and emptiness-bliss.
Kālacakra: cosmic, calendrical, political-mythic, and subtle-body totality.

3. Structural Map
A. Outer Kālacakra

Cosmos, time cycles, astrology, geography, world-ages, and the structuring of external reality.

B. Inner Kālacakra

Body, channels, winds, drops, breath, subtle physiology, and the human microcosm.

C. Other / Alternative Kālacakra

Initiation, mandala, deity yoga, completion-stage transformation, and awakened time.

D. Shambhala Frame

Kālacakra is inseparable from the mythic-political-symbolic imagination of Shambhala: an enlightened kingdom, hidden order, and future restoration motif.

E. Macrocosm / Microcosm Correlation

The outer universe and inner body mirror each other; liberation occurs by understanding and transforming their correspondence.

F. Buddhahood Through Time

Rather than escaping time abstractly, Kālacakra transforms the experience and structure of time itself.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Cosmology	Maps the outer wheel of time
Astrology / cycles	Shows time as patterned, not random
Geography / world-system	Places practice in a cosmic-historical field
Subtle body	Turns the human body into microcosm
Channels/winds/drops	Gives the inner mechanism of transformation
Mandala/initiation	Rebuilds identity and space ritually
Shambhala mythos	Adds sacred history and future-world imagination
Completion-stage yoga	Transforms the inner wheel into awakened gnosis
Buddhahood frame	Makes time itself part of liberation
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Time as Structure

Time is not merely clock-sequence. It is wheel, pattern, cycle, karma-field, cosmic order, and transformation-medium.

Cluster B — Outer Cosmos

The world is rendered through cosmology: planets, cycles, elements, directions, world-systems, and historical ages.

Cluster C — Inner Body

The human body is not separate from the cosmos; it is the cosmos condensed as channels, winds, drops, breath, and subtle centres.

Cluster D — Shambhala

Shambhala functions as hidden kingdom, ideal order, initiatory myth, and symbol of enlightened civilization.

Cluster E — Mandala and Initiation

The Kālacakra mandala is an interface between cosmic order and awakened identity.

Cluster F — Macrocosm / Microcosm

The key interpretive bridge: what appears outside as cosmos appears inside as body.

Cluster G — Liberation of Time

Awakening is not outside time in a simple sense; it is the transformation of how time, body, and cosmos are known.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Wheel of Time: Why Kālacakra Is the Tantra of Cosmic Rendering
Outer Kālacakra: Planets, Cycles, Worlds, and the Patterned Cosmos
Inner Kālacakra: The Body as a Condensed Universe
Shambhala as Imaginal Kingdom and Future Order
Macrocosm and Microcosm: When Cosmos and Body Mirror Each Other
The Kālacakra Mandala as Time-Engine
Channels, Winds, Drops: Subtle Body in the Wheel of Time
Awakening Time: Kālacakra and the Re-Rendering of History
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Use the 84000 translation for reference and light quotation only. Use Sanskrit scans for source triangulation where useful.

Target passage packs:

Opening frame of the tantra
“Wheel of Time” definition/context material
Outer cosmology passages
Astrology/cycle passages
Inner body passages
Channels/winds/drops passages
Mandala/initiation passages
Shambhala-related passages
Macrocosm/microcosm correlation passages
Completion-stage or Buddhahood passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Time/cycles	Very high	Defining feature
Cosmology	Very high	Core source value
Macrocosm/microcosm	Very high	Essential
Subtle body	High	Especially inner Kālacakra
Mandala/initiation	High	Vajrayāna frame
Shambhala mythos	Very high	Distinctive symbolic-historical layer
Deity yoga	High	Present within system
Fierce deity symbolism	Medium	Less central than Hevajra
Śākta metaphysics	Low	Different tradition
Imaginarium use	Very high	Best cosmic rendering source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the cosmic-time and macrocosm/microcosm source.

Editorial danger: reducing Kālacakra to “Tibetan astrology” or to vague Shambhala fantasy. The real value is more structural:

Kālacakra renders reality as a synchronized wheel: outer cosmos, inner body, social myth, ritual mandala, and awakened gnosis all interlock as different scales of one temporal machine.

This is the best source for connecting Imaginarium to astrology-dashboard thinking, significant periods, planetary cycles, and embodied cosmology without falling into shallow fortune-telling.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Guhyasamāja and Hevajra:

Do not make this mainly about:

generic deity yoga
secrecy alone
fierce deity intensity
yoginī/ḍākinī symbolism
transgressive imagery

Emphasize:

time
cycles
astrology
cosmology
subtle body as microcosm
Shambhala
history as symbolic field
mandala as cosmic interface

Tone should be vast, cosmic, calendrical, mythic, and structural.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

simple practical yoga pedagogy
Kālī-style devotional poetry
Śākta power-metaphysics
direct perception micro-practices
accessible beginner subtle-body language
public-domain English translation base
non-initiatory simplicity

Pair with:

The Serpent Power for Hindu cakra architecture
Layayoga for technical subtle-body physiology
Guhyasamāja for mandalic Buddhahood architecture
Hevajra for fierce Vajrayāna symbolic transformation
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct awareness thresholds
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
The Wheel of Time as Tantric Cosmology
Outer Kālacakra: Cosmos as Patterned Rendering
Inner Kālacakra: Body as Microcosm
Channels, Winds, Drops, and Time
Shambhala as Hidden Civilizational Imagination
Mandala as Cosmic Interface
Astrology Without Fortune-Telling: Time as Field of Practice
Macrocosm/Microcosm and the Re-Rendered Body
History as Tantric Symbolic Field
Buddhahood as the Liberation of Time
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Kālacakra Tantra is the cosmic-time source.

Earlier sources re-render through energy, subtle body, dissolution, awareness, goddess, mantra, mandala, or fierce deity. Kālacakra re-renders through scale:

breath mirrors time
body mirrors cosmos
channels mirror cosmic pathways
cycles mirror karmic patterning
mandala mirrors universal order
Shambhala mirrors hidden sacred civilization
astrology becomes symbolic timing, not crude prediction
awakening becomes liberation from ordinary time-rendering

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Kālacakra Tantra shows that the self-world is rendered at multiple scales at once: bodily, planetary, historical, mythic, and cosmic. To awaken is not merely to leave the world but to understand and transform the wheel by which time, body, cosmos, and consciousness appear together.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 11: Svātmārāma — Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā

Access status: public-domain English translation / public-domain scan available. Internet Archive hosts Pancham Singh’s Sanskrit text with English translation and notes, marked “Usage: Public Domain.” It also hosts a 1915 scan of The Hatha Yoga Pradipika.

1. Source Identity

Source: Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā
Attributed author/compiler: Svātmārāma
Translation base: Pancham Singh English translation
Tradition: Haṭha Yoga, Nātha-influenced yoga, medieval yoga synthesis
Likely period: 15th century CE
Primary axis: body discipline → breath restraint → mudrā/bandha → kuṇḍalinī → nāda → samādhi
Best Imaginarium use: the “body-breath machine” source: how yogic transformation begins by re-engineering the gross/subtle interface.

The Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā is one of the most influential haṭha yoga texts. It includes material on purification, āsana, prāṇāyāma, kumbhaka, mudrā, meditation, cakras, kuṇḍalinī, and nādānusandhāna, or concentration on inner sound.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

The Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā is the bridge between yogic body-technique and tantric subtle-body transformation.

Compared with the previous sources:

Sivananda: modern, devotional, synthetic kundalini pedagogy.
Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: older technical source for the bodily-breath disciplines that make kuṇḍalinī-yoga possible.

The Serpent Power: symbolic cakra architecture.
Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: practical energetic machinery: posture, breath, seal, lock, inner sound.

Layayoga: systematic chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: compact medieval yogic technology for forcing the body-mind into stillness.

Vijñāna Bhairava: micro-openings through perception, breath-gaps, shock, void.
Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: disciplined manipulation of breath, prāṇa, bindu, and kuṇḍalinī.

Mahānirvāṇa / Shakti and Shâkta / Kālī hymn: Śākta theology, metaphysics, and goddess invocation.
Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: yogic praxis more than goddess theology.

Guhyasamāja / Hevajra / Kālacakra: Vajrayāna mandala, deity, subtle body, and cosmic time.
Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: non-Buddhist haṭha-yogic body-breath technology, though historically adjacent to tantric worlds.

3. Structural Map
A. Āsana

The body is stabilized, purified, and made fit for deeper energetic work.

B. Prāṇāyāma / Kumbhaka

Breath becomes the lever by which prāṇa and mind are restrained. Breath-control is not wellness breathing; it is psycho-energetic command.

C. Mudrā and Bandha

Locks, seals, and internal gestures redirect subtle force, awaken latent energy, and preserve the inner essence.

D. Kuṇḍalinī and Suṣumṇā

The central channel becomes the axis of transformation. The aim is to move beyond dispersed energetic life into central stillness.

E. Nāda / Inner Sound

The later movement of the text turns toward inner sound as an absorption pathway.

F. Samādhi

Haṭha is not merely physical discipline. It culminates in absorption, stillness, and liberation.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Invocation and lineage	Places haṭha under Śiva/Nātha authority
Āsana	Stabilizes the body as a yogic instrument
Diet and conduct	Sets the conditions for practice
Prāṇāyāma	Makes breath the handle of mind and prāṇa
Kumbhaka	Produces stillness and energetic suspension
Mudrā	Seals and redirects subtle force
Bandha	Locks the body’s energetic gates
Kuṇḍalinī	Names the latent transformative force
Nāda	Uses inner sound as absorption-object
Samādhi	Resolves technique into liberation
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — The Body as Practice-Engine

The body is not treated as an obstacle to transcendence. It is trained into becoming the instrument of transcendence.

Cluster B — Breath as Control Surface

Mind and prāṇa move together. To alter breath is to alter the rendering-rate of thought, desire, sensation, and identity.

Cluster C — Haṭha as Forceful Method

“Haṭha” here has an edge: disciplined pressure applied to the body-mind system until it yields to yogic stillness.

Cluster D — Mudrā / Bandha as Inner Engineering

Locks and seals are not symbolic gestures only. They are imagined as ways of reversing leakage, redirecting force, and compelling ascent.

Cluster E — Kuṇḍalinī and Centralization

Spiritual transformation depends on prāṇa entering the central channel. Ordinary life is dispersion; yoga is centralization.

Cluster F — Nāda as Subtle Absorption

Inner sound becomes a non-visual imaginal doorway: hearing the subtle vibration by which mind is drawn into stillness.

Cluster G — Samādhi Beyond Technique

The entire body-breath technology is subordinate to absorption and liberation, not fitness or spectacle.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Body as Yogic Engine: Why Haṭha Begins With Form
Breath as the Lever of Mind: Prāṇāyāma in the Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā
Kumbhaka and the Pause That Stops the World
Mudrā and Bandha: Sealing the Leaks in the Rendered Body
The Central Channel: From Dispersed Life to Suṣumṇā
Kuṇḍalinī in the Haṭha Tradition: Power, Pressure, and Ascent
Nāda: Inner Sound as the Path of Absorption
Haṭha as Re-Rendering: When the Body Learns Liberation
7. Passage-Pack Targets

Because Pancham Singh’s translation is public domain, moderate quotation is possible, but the blueprint should still stay commentary-led.

Target passage packs:

Opening lineage / Śiva / Nātha frame
Six causes of success in yoga
Āsana as steadiness and preparation
Diet / moderation passages
Prāṇāyāma and nāḍī purification passages
Kumbhaka and stilling of mind passages
Mudrā and bandha passages
Kuṇḍalinī awakening passages
Suṣumṇā / central channel passages
Nāda / inner sound passages
Samādhi / rāja-yoga culmination passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Āsana as preparation	Very high	Foundational first movement
Prāṇāyāma / kumbhaka	Very high	Central source value
Mudrā / bandha	Very high	Distinctive haṭha technology
Kuṇḍalinī	High	Practical energetic framing
Suṣumṇā / nāḍī	High	Strong central-channel emphasis
Nāda / inner sound	High	Crucial final absorption method
Śākta theology	Low-Medium	Present indirectly through kuṇḍalinī, not main mode
Cakra symbolism	Medium	Less detailed than The Serpent Power
Ritual theology	Low	Not the main register
Imaginarium use	Very high	Best body-breath re-engineering source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the haṭha-yogic body-breath technology source.

Editorial danger: modernizing it into “yoga poses and breathing exercises.” That misses the medieval intensity of the text.

Best framing:

The Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā treats the human organism as a transformable engine. Posture stabilizes it, breath restrains it, locks seal it, kuṇḍalinī energizes it, inner sound absorbs it, and samādhi releases it.

This is not lifestyle yoga. It is an energetic assault on ordinary embodiment so that the scattered body-mind can be recollected into the central channel.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Sivananda and Goswami:

Do not make this mainly:

modern safe kundalini advice
broad devotional pedagogy
exhaustive chakra anatomy
philosophical Śakti metaphysics
gentle wellness yoga

Emphasize instead:

medieval haṭha intensity
body as instrument
breath as command system
mudrā and bandha as energetic locks
forceful centralization
inner sound absorption
haṭha as technical precursor to rāja-yoga

Tone should be compact, muscular, technical, and austere.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

rich goddess theology
detailed cakra-petal symbolism
nondual Śaiva micro-practice phenomenology
Vajrayāna mandala/deity yoga
cosmic astrology/time architecture
modern safety commentary
philosophical defence of tantra

Pair with:

The Serpent Power for cakra and Śakti architecture
Layayoga for more systematic subtle physiology
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct perception thresholds
Shakti and Shâkta for power-metaphysics
Kālacakra Tantra for macrocosm/microcosm timing
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Haṭha as the Forceful Path
The Six Causes of Yogic Success
The Body Made Fit for Subtle Work
Prāṇāyāma as Mind-Control Through Breath
Kumbhaka and the Suspension of Rendering
Mudrā as Energetic Seal
Bandha as Inner Lock
Kuṇḍalinī and the Central Channel
Nāda as Subtle Sound-Gate
From Haṭha to Rāja-Yoga: Technique Resolving Into Samādhi
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, the Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā is the body-breath re-engineering source.

Previous sources re-render through discipline, cakra architecture, dissolution, direct perception, Śākta ritual order, power metaphysics, goddess invocation, mandala, fierce deity, or cosmic time. This source adds the physical-subtle lever:

posture stabilizes the rendering apparatus
diet and restraint reduce noise
breath modulates mind
kumbhaka suspends ordinary flow
mudrā seals energetic leakage
bandha redirects force
suṣumṇā recenters the system
kuṇḍalinī energizes vertical transformation
nāda draws attention into subtle absorption

Core Imaginarium thesis:

The Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā shows that consciousness is not re-rendered by thought alone. The body-breath system is itself a control surface. When posture, breath, locks, seals, and inner sound are reorganized, the ordinary self-world loses its default momentum and the organism becomes capable of samādhi.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 12: Śiva Saṃhitā

Access status: public-domain / public-access. Internet Archive hosts the Rai Bahadur Srisa Chandra Vasu English translation, based on the 1914 edition, and HathiTrust identifies it as a reprint of the 1914 Panini Office edition in Sacred Books of the Hindus.

1. Source Identity

Source: Śiva Saṃhitā / Siva Samhita
Tradition: Haṭha Yoga / Śaiva yoga / tantric-yogic synthesis
Form: Śiva teaches Pārvatī
Primary axis: nondual metaphysics → body as microcosm → nāḍīs/prāṇa → mudrā → kuṇḍalinī → liberation
Best Imaginarium use: the source for the yogic body as total cosmos: not just a practice-body, but a world-body.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Śiva Saṃhitā belongs beside Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā and Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā as a major haṭha-yogic source, but it is more metaphysical and expansive than a simple technique manual.

Compared with previous sources:

Sivananda: modern kundalini pedagogy.
Śiva Saṃhitā: older Śaiva yogic synthesis of metaphysics, subtle body, and practice.

The Serpent Power: detailed cakra-symbol architecture.
Śiva Saṃhitā: broader yogic cosmology of body, prāṇa, nāḍī, and liberation.

Layayoga: technical chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Śiva Saṃhitā: more mythic-metaphysical and less modern-systematic.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct awareness thresholds.
Śiva Saṃhitā: disciplined inner yogic transformation through body, breath, and subtle channels.

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: compact haṭha technology.
Śiva Saṃhitā: haṭha plus metaphysical worldview.

3. Structural Map
A. Nondual Opening

The text begins with metaphysical teaching: the self, illusion, reality, and liberation.

B. Body as Microcosm

The human body is rendered as a complete inner universe containing sacred geography, forces, channels, and worlds.

C. Nāḍī and Prāṇa System

The subtle body is structured through channels, winds, breath, and inner circulation.

D. Yogic Methods

Āsana, prāṇāyāma, mudrā, concentration, mantra, and internal seals are presented as transformation methods.

E. Kuṇḍalinī and Central Channel

Energy is gathered and redirected toward liberation through the central subtle axis.

F. Liberation

The aim is not technique itself but freedom from delusion and realization of the supreme state.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Śiva-Pārvatī frame	Establishes revealed Śaiva authority
Nondual metaphysics	Gives the liberation-context before technique
Body-cosmos teaching	Makes the body a sacred interior world
Nāḍī teaching	Maps channels of subtle movement
Prāṇāyāma	Links breath, mind, and prāṇa
Mudrā	Seals and redirects the body’s subtle force
Kuṇḍalinī	Names the transformative latent power
Mantra/concentration	Reorders attention and speech
Liberation teaching	Resolves yogic method into realization
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Śiva’s Nondual Frame

The text begins from the question of reality, bondage, illusion, and liberation, preventing haṭha from becoming merely bodily technique.

Cluster B — The Body as Inner Cosmos

The body contains sacred geography and cosmic structure. The practitioner does not escape the body; he discovers the universe inside it.

Cluster C — Nāḍīs as Rendering Pathways

The subtle channels are the hidden routes by which prāṇa, attention, and embodied identity move.

Cluster D — Breath as Mind-Lever

Prāṇāyāma is not relaxation. It is intervention in the motion of consciousness.

Cluster E — Mudrā as Energetic Reversal

Mudrās redirect flow, seal leakage, and transform the direction of embodied life.

Cluster F — Kuṇḍalinī as Latent Śakti

The dormant power becomes the motor of inner ascent and liberation.

Cluster G — Yoga as Liberation Technology

All methods point back to freedom from ignorance, not occult display.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Śiva Teaches the Body-Cosmos: The World Inside the Yogi
The Nondual Opening of the Śiva Saṃhitā
Nāḍīs as the Hidden Roads of Consciousness
Prāṇa and Mind: Breath as the Handle of Rendering
Mudrā as Reversal: Sealing the Body’s Energetic Leaks
Kuṇḍalinī in the Śiva Saṃhitā: Latent Power and Liberation
Sacred Geography Within the Body
Haṭha Beyond Technique: The Śiva Saṃhitā as Yogic Metaphysics
7. Passage-Pack Targets
Śiva-Pārvatī opening frame
Nondual metaphysical passages
Body as microcosm passages
Sacred geography within the body
Nāḍī enumeration and central channel passages
Prāṇāyāma passages
Mudrā passages
Kuṇḍalinī passages
Mantra/concentration passages
Liberation/realization passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Body as microcosm	Very high	Distinctive source strength
Nondual metaphysics	High	Stronger than many haṭha manuals
Nāḍī/prāṇa system	High	Central yogic mechanism
Mudrā	High	Major practice category
Kuṇḍalinī	High	Important but not Avalon-style symbolic density
Cakra symbolism	Medium	Present, but less diagrammatic
Śākta theology	Medium	Śakti present through kuṇḍalinī, but Śiva frame dominates
Ritual theology	Low-Medium	Not main use
Direct awareness micro-practice	Medium	Less like Vijñāna Bhairava
Imaginarium use	Very high	Excellent world-body source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the body-as-cosmos source.

Editorial danger: treating it as just another haṭha yoga technique text. Its real value is that it joins haṭha method to a vast metaphysical and cosmological body-image.

Best framing:

Śiva Saṃhitā shows the yogic body as a complete world-system. Breath, channels, sacred geography, latent power, and liberation all occur inside the human microcosm.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā:

Do not make this mainly:

āsana and prāṇāyāma technique
mudrā mechanics alone
body-breath austerity
forceful haṭha discipline

Emphasize:

Śiva’s revelatory teaching
nondual metaphysical opening
the body as interior universe
sacred geography
nāḍīs as subtle world-roads
yoga as cosmological self-recognition

Tone should be spacious, metaphysical, yogic, and world-body oriented.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

detailed Śākta cakra-petal imagery
goddess-poetic invocation
Vajrayāna mandala/deity yoga
Kālacakra time-cosmology
modern safety pedagogy
direct Śaiva recognition micro-practices
systematic modern chakra physiology

Pair with:

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā for compact body-breath technology
The Serpent Power for cakra-symbol architecture
Layayoga for systematic subtle physiology
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct perception thresholds
Kālacakra Tantra for macrocosm/microcosm comparison
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Śiva’s Teaching to Pārvatī
The Nondual Foundation of Yoga
The Body as a Complete Cosmos
Sacred Geography Inside the Yogi
Nāḍīs as Inner Rivers
Prāṇa and Mind as Linked Motion
Mudrā and Energetic Reversal
Kuṇḍalinī as Latent Liberation-Power
Mantra and Concentration in the Subtle Body
Liberation Through the World-Body
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Śiva Saṃhitā is the world-body source.

It gives the Imaginarium a crucial bridge: the body is not merely a biological organism, and not merely a symbolic diagram. It is the condensed cosmos in which liberation happens.

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Śiva Saṃhitā shows that the rendered world is already folded into the body. The yogi does not flee the cosmos; he discovers its hidden channels, rivers, powers, and sacred geography within himself, then re-renders that body-world toward liberation.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 13: Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā

Access status: public domain / public-access. Internet Archive hosts Srisa Chandra Vasu’s 1895 translation marked with a Public Domain Mark, and the Wellcome Collection states the work can be used “for any purpose without restriction under copyright law.”

1. Source Identity

Source: Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā
Form: dialogue between Gheraṇḍa and Caṇḍa
Tradition: Haṭha Yoga / Ghatastha Yoga
Primary axis: purification → strengthening → steadiness → withdrawal → breath-lightness → meditation → samādhi
Best Imaginarium use: the “vessel-making” source: how the body-mind is cleaned, strengthened, sealed, refined, interiorized, and made capable of realization.

Unlike the Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā, which is compact and forceful, Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā is more encyclopedic and staged. It gives a sevenfold yoga of embodied refinement rather than a simple list of techniques.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā belongs to the classic haṭha-yoga triad alongside Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā and Śiva Saṃhitā. It is distinctive because it presents ghatastha yoga, “vessel yoga,” where the body-mind is treated as a vessel to be purified, trained, and perfected. It is commonly described as a seven-chapter text of 351 verses.

Compared with previous sources:

Sivananda: modern kundalini pedagogy.
Gheraṇḍa: older staged body-vessel discipline.

The Serpent Power: cakra-symbol architecture.
Gheraṇḍa: body purification, mudrā, breath, meditation, and samādhi sequence.

Layayoga: subtle-body physiology and dissolution.
Gheraṇḍa: whole-body yogic conditioning before subtle absorption.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct awareness thresholds.
Gheraṇḍa: progressive refinement of the practitioner as vessel.

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā: body-breath re-engineering.
Gheraṇḍa: sevenfold embodied curriculum with stronger emphasis on purification and staged perfection.

3. Structural Map
A. Śodhana — Purification

Cleansing practices prepare the vessel by reducing impurity, obstruction, and bodily disorder.

B. Dṛḍhatā — Strength

Āsana develops stability, bodily power, and fitness for deeper yoga.

C. Sthiratā — Steadiness

Mudrā stabilizes and seals the inner system.

D. Dhairya — Patience / Composure

Pratyāhāra withdraws the senses and reduces reactivity to external objects.

E. Lāghava — Lightness

Prāṇāyāma refines the body-breath field and produces inner lightness.

F. Pratyakṣa — Direct Perception

Dhyāna opens inner seeing and meditative perception.

G. Nirliptatā — Non-attachment

Samādhi culminates the process in freedom and non-clinging.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section	Function
Purification	Makes the vessel clean enough for yoga
Āsana	Makes the vessel strong
Mudrā	Makes the vessel sealed and steady
Pratyāhāra	Reclaims attention from objects
Prāṇāyāma	Refines breath, energy, and inner lightness
Dhyāna	Turns attention into direct inner seeing
Samādhi	Releases the practitioner into non-attachment and realization
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Vessel Yoga

The human being is a ghaṭa: a vessel. Yoga is the art of making this vessel capable of holding realization.

Cluster B — Purification Before Subtlety

The text begins not with metaphysics but cleansing. Before ascent, vision, or samādhi, the organism must be cleared.

Cluster C — Strength and Steadiness

The body is trained as a stable container, not rejected as an obstacle.

Cluster D — Sealing the System

Mudrā turns the body into a contained energetic instrument.

Cluster E — Withdrawal and Recollection

Pratyāhāra breaks the default outward-rendering of consciousness.

Cluster F — Breath-Lightness

Prāṇāyāma changes the felt density of embodiment.

Cluster G — Meditation and Samādhi

The refined vessel becomes transparent to realization.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Vessel Yoga: The Body-Mind as a Container for Realization
Purification First: Why Gheraṇḍa Begins with Cleansing
The Strong Vessel: Āsana Before Subtle Transformation
Mudrā and the Sealed Body: Stabilizing the Inner System
Pratyāhāra: Reclaiming Attention from the Rendered World
Prāṇāyāma and Lightness: Breath as Refinement of Embodiment
Dhyāna as Inner Seeing: Meditation After the Vessel Is Prepared
Samādhi and Non-Attachment: When the Vessel Becomes Transparent
7. Passage-Pack Targets
Gheraṇḍa-Caṇḍa dialogue opening
Definition of ghatastha yoga
Sevenfold discipline overview
Śodhana / purification passages
Āsana catalogue passages
Mudrā passages
Pratyāhāra passages
Prāṇāyāma passages
Dhyāna passages
Samādhi passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Purification	Very high	Distinctive opening emphasis
Āsana	Very high	Strong chapter treatment
Mudrā	High	Central to steadiness
Pratyāhāra	High	Clear staged role
Prāṇāyāma	High	Linked to lightness
Dhyāna	High	Inner perception
Samādhi	High	Culminating aim
Kuṇḍalinī	Medium	Less central than Avalon/Sivananda
Śākta metaphysics	Low	Not the main register
Imaginarium use	Very high	Strong vessel/refinement model
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the vessel-preparation source.

Editorial danger: turning it into a catalogue of old yoga techniques. Its real force is sequential: it understands transformation as the progressive preparation of the embodied container.

Best framing:

Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā teaches that realization requires a vessel. The body-mind must be cleaned, strengthened, steadied, withdrawn, lightened, interiorized, and finally released.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā and Śiva Saṃhitā:

Do not center mainly on:

forceful breath-control
kuṇḍalinī ascent
body as cosmos
nondual metaphysics
inner sound

Emphasize instead:

sevenfold sequencing
body as vessel
purification as first principle
progressive embodied refinement
pratyāhāra and dhyāna as later fruits
samādhi emerging from prepared embodiment

Tone should be staged, practical, austere, and architectural.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

detailed cakra-petal symbolism
Śākta goddess theology
Vajrayāna deity yoga
Kālacakra cosmology
direct Śaiva micro-practice
poetic deity invocation
modern psychological safety framing

Pair with:

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā for body-breath intensity
Śiva Saṃhitā for body-cosmos metaphysics
The Serpent Power for cakra architecture
Layayoga for subtle physiology
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct perception thresholds
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
The Ghaṭa: Body-Mind as Vessel
Sevenfold Yoga as Embodied Curriculum
Śodhana and the Clearing of the Vessel
Āsana as Strengthening the Container
Mudrā as Sealing the Inner System
Pratyāhāra as Withdrawal from Rendered Objects
Prāṇāyāma as Lightening the Body
Dhyāna as Inner Perception
Samādhi as Non-Attached Transparency
From Vessel to Liberation
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā is the vessel-refinement source.

It gives a clean architecture for embodied transformation:

purification clears noise
strength builds the vessel
steadiness seals the system
withdrawal reverses outward capture
breath creates lightness
meditation opens inner seeing
samādhi makes the vessel transparent

Core Imaginarium thesis:

The self-world cannot be re-rendered by insight alone if the vessel is unstable. Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā shows the body-mind as a container that must be purified, strengthened, steadied, recollected, lightened, and made transparent to liberation.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 14: Gorakṣaśataka / Gorakṣa Paddhati

Access status: public-access Sanskrit scan available; English translations are often modern/copyrighted, so use summary-first and avoid long quotation. Internet Archive hosts Goraksh Paddhati as a Digital Library of India Sanskrit scan. The text is an early Haṭha Yoga source attributed to Gorakṣa/Gorakṣanātha, associated with breath, bandha, kuṇḍalinī, and ascetic yogic method.

1. Source Identity

Source: Gorakṣaśataka / Gorakṣa Paddhati
Attributed figure: Gorakṣa / Gorakṣanātha
Tradition: Nātha Yoga / early Haṭha Yoga / ascetic kundalinī-yoga
Primary axis: breath conquest → diet/restraint → posture → bandha → Sarasvatī stimulation → kuṇḍalinī ascent → samādhi
Best Imaginarium use: the early Nātha “ascetic ignition” source: how forceful yogic discipline converts the body into a liberation-device.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

This source belongs before the later systematic haṭha compendia.

Compared with Sivananda:
Sivananda gives modern practical kundalinī pedagogy; Gorakṣaśataka gives older ascetic haṭha force.

Compared with Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā:
The Pradīpikā is a later synthesis; Gorakṣaśataka is earlier, sharper, more ascetic, and foundational.

Compared with Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā:
Gheraṇḍa is staged vessel-refinement; Gorakṣaśataka is more direct breath-bandha-kuṇḍalinī ignition.

Compared with The Serpent Power:
Avalon gives symbolic cakra architecture; Gorakṣa gives a terse yogic mechanism.

Compared with Vajrayāna sources:
No mandala/deity-yoga architecture here. The body itself is the battlefield of breath, channel, power, and liberation.

3. Structural Map
A. Ascetic Frame

The text addresses renunciant yogins seeking liberation through disciplined bodily transformation.

B. Breath Conquest

Prāṇa is the central lever. To conquer breath is to conquer mind and bodily dispersion.

C. Diet and Restraint

Measured conduct supports energetic control.

D. Posture

Stable seats prepare the body for breath and bandha.

E. Sarasvatī / Kuṇḍalinī Stimulation

The source is notable for early kundalinī-raising material, including stimulation of Sarasvatī.

F. Bandhas

Mūla, Uḍḍiyāna, and Jālandhara redirect force and enable ascent.

G. Samādhi and Truth

Technique resolves into realization.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section Function	Role
Ascetic introduction	Defines audience and aim
Breath conquest	Establishes prāṇa as control-system
Measured diet	Reduces bodily and mental disturbance
Posture	Stabilizes the organism
Sarasvatī stimulation	Opens early kundalinī mechanism
Kumbhaka	Suspends ordinary psycho-physical flow
Three bandhas	Locks and redirects subtle force
Obstacles	Marks risks of dispersion and failure
Kuṇḍalinī ascent	Converts latent power into liberating motion
Realization	Ends in truth, not technique
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — The Ascetic Body

The body is not comforted; it is trained, pressured, and converted.

Cluster B — Breath as Sovereign Lever

Breath is the command-line of the organism. Control breath, and the mind-world changes.

Cluster C — Restraint as Energetic Economy

Diet and conduct are not moral extras; they preserve force.

Cluster D — Bandha as Yogic Lock

The locks create internal redirection. Ordinary leakage becomes vertical pressure.

Cluster E — Sarasvatī and Kuṇḍalinī

This source is important for early kundalinī technique language before later symbolic expansions.

Cluster F — Obstacles and Failure Modes

The yogic machine can misfire through excess, distraction, impurity, or lack of discipline.

Cluster G — Liberation Through Compression

The path works by compression: breath restrained, force sealed, attention centralized, power raised.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Gorakṣa and the Ascetic Engine of Haṭha Yoga
Conquest of Breath: Prāṇa as the Lever of Liberation
Measured Diet and the Economics of Yogic Force
The Three Locks: Bandha as Inner Redirection
Sarasvatī Stirred: Early Kundalinī in the Gorakṣa Tradition
Compression and Ascent: How Haṭha Turns Pressure into Awakening
Obstacles in the Yogic Machine
From Breath to Truth: Gorakṣa as Re-Rendering Discipline
7. Passage-Pack Targets
Opening ascetic frame
Breath-conquest verses
Measured diet passages
Padmāsana / Vajrāsana material
Sarasvatī stimulation passages
Kumbhaka passages
Mūla-bandha passages
Uḍḍiyāna-bandha passages
Jālandhara-bandha passages
Kuṇḍalinī ascent passages
Obstacles to yoga
Realization/truth closing material
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Breath conquest	Very high	Central mechanism
Bandha	Very high	Core source value
Early kuṇḍalinī	Very high	Distinctive historical importance
Ascetic discipline	High	Strong renunciant frame
Diet/restraint	Medium-High	Supports energetic economy
Cakra symbolism	Medium	Present but not Avalon-level
Śākta metaphysics	Low-Medium	Implicit through power-language
Ritual theology	Low	Not the register
Deity yoga	Low	Not Vajrayāna
Imaginarium use	High	Excellent “compression → ascent” model
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the early haṭha-kundalinī ignition source.

Editorial danger: softening it into wellness yoga. The text is older, ascetic, and forceful. It belongs to a world where liberation is engineered through disciplined pressure on breath, body, and subtle force.

Best framing:

Gorakṣaśataka shows haṭha yoga before it becomes domesticated: breath is conquered, force is sealed, kuṇḍalinī is stirred, and the body is turned into an ascetic engine of liberation.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā:

Do not make this a general haṭha overview.

Emphasize:

early source status
Gorakṣa/Nātha identity
breath conquest
ascetic compression
Sarasvatī stimulation
the three bandhas
kuṇḍalinī as ignition rather than later chakra-symbol system

Tone should be terse, severe, technical, and early-Nātha.

11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

full Śākta theology
goddess-poetic language
mandala/deity-yoga architecture
Kālacakra cosmology
detailed public-domain English commentary
modern safety framing
direct Śaiva awareness phenomenology

Pair with:

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā for later haṭha synthesis
Śiva Saṃhitā for body-cosmos metaphysics
Gheraṇḍa Saṃhitā for vessel-refinement sequence
The Serpent Power for full cakra symbolism
Layayoga for systematic modern subtle physiology
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
Gorakṣa as Early Haṭha Source
Breath Conquest and Mind Conquest
Measured Diet as Energetic Economy
Posture as Ascetic Stabilization
Sarasvatī and the Stirring of Kuṇḍalinī
The Three Bandhas as Yogic Locks
Kumbhaka and Compression of the Rendered Body
Obstacles to the Ascetic Machine
Kuṇḍalinī Ascent Before Modern Chakra Culture
From Force to Truth
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Gorakṣaśataka is the ascetic compression source.

It adds a necessary hard edge to the sequence:

breath is conquered
diet preserves energy
posture stabilizes force
bandha seals the body
kumbhaka suspends ordinary flow
kuṇḍalinī is stirred
ascent replaces dispersion
truth replaces bodily-world habit

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Gorakṣaśataka shows re-rendering as pressure. The ordinary self-world is maintained by dispersed breath, appetite, leakage, and motion. Haṭha reverses that dispersion: it seals, compresses, centralizes, and ignites the body until consciousness can rise out of its habitual rendering.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 15: Yoga Yājñavalkya

Access status: public-domain Sanskrit scan available. Internet Archive hosts the 1938 Trivandrum Sanskrit Series edition marked “Public Domain Mark 1.0.” A.G. Mohan’s English translation is copyrighted, so use the public Sanskrit base plus summary-first secondary reconstruction, avoiding long quotation.

1. Source Identity

Source: Yoga Yājñavalkya
Form: dialogue between Yājñavalkya and Gārgī
Tradition: early/medieval yoga, aṣṭāṅga yoga, prāṇāyāma, subtle-body yoga
Primary axis: ethical discipline → āsana → prāṇa → nāḍīs → meditation → liberation
Best Imaginarium use: the “classical yoga meets subtle body” bridge source.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

Yoga Yājñavalkya is not a Śākta tantra, not a Vajrayāna tantra, and not a fierce kundalinī manual. Its value is as a dialogical yogic synthesis where classical yoga discipline begins opening into subtle-body practice.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: modern kundalinī pedagogy.
Yoga Yājñavalkya: older yogic discipline with prāṇāyāma and nāḍī emphasis.

The Serpent Power: cakra-symbol architecture.
Yoga Yājñavalkya: less symbolic, more disciplined and practical.

Layayoga: systematic chakra/nāḍī physiology.
Yoga Yājñavalkya: earlier, simpler, less modern-systematic.

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā / Gorakṣa: forceful haṭha compression.
Yoga Yājñavalkya: calmer aṣṭāṅga-based interiorization.

3. Structural Map
A. Dialogue Frame

Yājñavalkya teaches Gārgī, giving the text a philosophical and instructional tone.

B. Yama and Niyama

The body-mind is ethically prepared before subtle work begins.

C. Āsana

Posture stabilizes the embodied field.

D. Nāḍī and Prāṇa

The subtle body becomes central: channels, breath, and internal regulation.

E. Prāṇāyāma

Breath is refined as a means of purifying and steadying consciousness.

F. Meditation and Liberation

Technique resolves into concentration, knowledge, and release.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section	Function
Dialogue opening	Frames yoga as transmitted wisdom
Yama	Clears behavioral disorder
Niyama	Establishes inner discipline
Āsana	Stabilizes the practice-body
Nāḍī teaching	Introduces subtle infrastructure
Prāṇāyāma	Refines breath and mind
Pratyāhāra / dhāraṇā	Withdraws and gathers attention
Dhyāna / samādhi	Culminates in liberating absorption
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Dialogical Yoga

The text matters because yoga is taught through philosophical instruction, not just technical listing.

Cluster B — Ethical Grounding

Yama and niyama are not moral decoration; they prepare the organism for subtle transformation.

Cluster C — The Stable Seat

Āsana is functional: it makes the body capable of breath, attention, and interiorization.

Cluster D — Nāḍī-Based Interiorization

The source moves from classical discipline into subtle-body mapping.

Cluster E — Breath as Purification

Prāṇāyāma becomes the bridge between gross body, subtle body, and mind.

Cluster F — Liberation Through Ordered Practice

The method is gradual: clean conduct, stable body, refined breath, gathered mind, release.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Yājñavalkya Teaches Gārgī: Yoga as Dialogical Transmission
Ethics Before Energy: Yama and Niyama as Subtle Preparation
The Stable Seat and the Recollected Body
Nāḍīs Before Chakras: The Early Subtle Body of Yoga Yājñavalkya
Prāṇāyāma as the Bridge Between Body and Liberation
Interiorization Without Spectacle: The Quiet Power of Classical Yoga
From Aṣṭāṅga to Subtle Body: Why This Text Bridges Worlds
Yoga Yājñavalkya and Re-Rendering Through Ordered Practice
7. Passage-Pack Targets
Yājñavalkya-Gārgī dialogue opening
Yama passages
Niyama passages
Āsana passages
Nāḍī passages
Prāṇa / vāyu passages
Prāṇāyāma passages
Pratyāhāra / dhāraṇā material
Dhyāna / samādhi material
Liberation / knowledge passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Ethical discipline	Very high	Strong foundation
Āsana	Medium-High	Functional, not modern posture-yoga
Prāṇāyāma	Very high	Core source value
Nāḍī subtle body	High	Major bridge feature
Kuṇḍalinī	Low-Medium	Not central like Avalon/Sivananda
Cakra symbolism	Low	Not the main register
Śākta theology	Low	Not a goddess tantra
Vajrayāna mandala	Low	Different lineage
Liberation	High	Clear final aim
Imaginarium use	High	Excellent “ordered re-rendering” source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the classical-yoga/subtle-body bridge source.

Editorial danger: making it sound like later haṭha or kundalinī tantra. Its force is quieter: it shows disciplined yoga becoming subtle-body yoga without the full symbolic density of later tantric systems.

Best framing:

Yoga Yājñavalkya shows yoga as ordered reconfiguration: conduct, body, breath, channels, attention, and knowledge are aligned until liberation becomes possible.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with haṭha sources:

Do not center:

forceful mudrā/bandha mechanics
kundalinī spectacle
cakra diagrams
fierce ascetic compression
goddess metaphysics

Emphasize:

dialogue with Gārgī
ethical sequencing
prāṇāyāma
nāḍī purification
classical aṣṭāṅga structure
calm interiorization
11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

full cakra architecture
Śākta theology
deity invocation
Vajrayāna mandala
fierce symbolic transformation
Kālacakra cosmology
operational haṭha intensity

Pair with:

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā for stronger haṭha technique
Śiva Saṃhitā for body-cosmos metaphysics
The Serpent Power for cakra symbolism
Layayoga for systematic subtle physiology
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct recognition
12. Recommended Next Passage Packs
The Gārgī Dialogue Frame
Yama/Niyama as Energetic Ethics
Āsana as Stabilized Embodiment
Nāḍīs as Early Subtle Infrastructure
Prāṇāyāma as Purification of the Rendered Body
Pratyāhāra and Withdrawal from Objects
Meditation as Ordered Interiorization
Liberation Through Disciplined Alignment
13. Imaginarium Use

For the Path of Re-Rendering, Yoga Yājñavalkya is the ordered interiorization source.

Core Imaginarium thesis:

Yoga Yājñavalkya shows that re-rendering does not always begin with shock, goddess, serpent, mandala, or cosmic time. Sometimes it begins with order: conduct is cleaned, posture steadied, breath refined, channels purified, attention withdrawn, and the self-world slowly loses its disorderly momentum.

Coverage-First Yoga/Tantra Source Companion Blueprint
Source 16: Patañjali — Yoga Sūtras / Pātañjalayogaśāstra

Access status: public-domain translations/scans available. Internet Archive hosts James Haughton Woods’ 1914 Yoga-System of Patañjali and marks it “In Public Domain.” Sacred Texts also hosts Charles Johnston’s 1912 translation.

1. Source Identity

Source: Yoga Sūtras of Patañjali
Commentarial frame: traditionally read with the Yoga Bhāṣya
Tradition: Classical Yoga / Sāṃkhya-Yoga
Primary axis: citta-vṛtti-nirodha → samādhi → discriminative knowledge → kaivalya
Best Imaginarium use: the “mind-rendering control text”: how perception, identity, memory, affliction, and liberation depend on the stilling and clarification of the mind-field.

2. Yoga/Tantra Lineage Placement

This is not a tantra text in the same sense as Vijñāna Bhairava, Mahānirvāṇa, Hevajra, or Kālacakra. It is the classical yogic foundation that later yoga/tantra systems repeatedly inherit, adapt, or react against.

Compared with prior sources:

Sivananda: modern kundalinī pedagogy.
Yoga Sūtras: classical mental discipline and samādhi theory.

The Serpent Power / Layayoga: subtle-body architecture and energetic dissolution.
Yoga Sūtras: mind-field analysis, afflictions, concentration, and kaivalya.

Vijñāna Bhairava: direct recognition through gaps, shock, breath, void, sensation.
Yoga Sūtras: systematic restraint of mental fluctuations.

Haṭha sources: body-breath technologies.
Yoga Sūtras: why body-breath work matters: it stabilizes the mind for samādhi.

3. Structural Map
A. Samādhi Pāda

Defines yoga as cessation/restriction of mental fluctuations and maps concentration, practice, dispassion, and samādhi.

B. Sādhana Pāda

Explains practice, afflictions, karma, suffering, and the eight limbs.

C. Vibhūti Pāda

Describes dhāraṇā, dhyāna, samādhi, saṃyama, and extraordinary capacities as by-products.

D. Kaivalya Pāda

Clarifies liberation, mind, latent impressions, guṇas, puruṣa, and final isolation/freedom.

4. Chapter / Section Functions
Section	Function
Definition of yoga	Establishes mind-stilling as the central method
Vṛtti analysis	Shows how consciousness is modified into experience
Practice/dispassion	Gives the two great stabilizers
Īśvara-praṇidhāna	Opens devotion/surrender inside classical yoga
Kleśas	Diagnoses the afflictive machinery of self-world rendering
Aṣṭāṅga yoga	Gives the full discipline-map
Saṃyama	Explains concentrated cognition
Siddhis	Treats powers as secondary, not final
Kaivalya	Final freedom of puruṣa from prakṛti’s display
5. Coverage Clusters
Cluster A — Mind as Rendering Field

The world is experienced through vṛttis: modifications, waves, formations, and movements of citta.

Cluster B — Nirodha

Yoga is the stopping, restraining, or settling of these formations so the seer can abide in its own nature.

Cluster C — Affliction Machinery

Ignorance, egoity, attachment, aversion, and clinging to life structure the self-world.

Cluster D — Eight-Limbed Reordering

Ethics, posture, breath, withdrawal, concentration, meditation, and samādhi form one continuous re-rendering ladder.

Cluster E — Saṃyama and Deep Cognition

Concentration becomes an instrument for penetrating structures of experience.

Cluster F — Powers as Distraction

Extraordinary capacities are acknowledged but subordinated to liberation.

Cluster G — Kaivalya

The final aim is not energetic ascent or deity-identification, but radical freedom of the seer.

6. Proposed Essay Sequence
Yoga as the Stilling of the Rendered Mind
Citta-Vṛtti: How the Mind Becomes a World
Practice and Dispassion: The Two Hands of Re-Rendering
The Kleśas: The Afflictive Engine of Selfhood
Aṣṭāṅga Yoga as Total System-Reset
Saṃyama: Concentration as Penetrative Cognition
Siddhis Without Seduction: Why Powers Are Not Liberation
Kaivalya: Freedom from the Machinery of Appearance
7. Passage-Pack Targets
Yoga definition passages
Seer abiding in itself
Vṛtti classification
Practice and dispassion passages
Īśvara-praṇidhāna passages
Kleśa passages
Aṣṭāṅga yoga passages
Pratyāhāra / dhāraṇā / dhyāna / samādhi passages
Saṃyama passages
Siddhi caution passages
Kaivalya passages
8. Coverage Matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Mind-field analysis	Very high	Core source value
Samādhi	Very high	Central axis
Ethics/discipline	High	Aṣṭāṅga structure
Prāṇāyāma	Medium	Important but not haṭha-style
Subtle body	Low	Not the main register
Kundalinī	Low	Not central
Śākta theology	Low	Different lineage
Vajrayāna mandala	Low	Different lineage
Siddhi theory	High	Important but secondary
Imaginarium use	Very high	Best citta-rendering source
9. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as the classical mind-rendering source.

Editorial danger: making it generic “yoga philosophy” or modern wellness spirituality. Its cutting edge is technical: experience is shaped by mental formations; yoga interrupts that machinery.

Best framing:

Patañjali gives the grammar of the rendered mind: fluctuation, identification, affliction, concentration, absorption, and final release.

10. Variety Review

To avoid overlap with haṭha and tantra sources:

Do not center:

chakras
kundalinī
goddess metaphysics
deity yoga
ritual secrecy
subtle-body diagrams

Emphasize:

citta
vṛtti
nirodha
kleśa
aṣṭāṅga
saṃyama
kaivalya
11. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak compared with other sources:

subtle-body physiology
mantra-deity ritual
Śākta power metaphysics
Vajrayāna mandala and deity yoga
fierce goddess imagery
cosmic time systems
kundalinī ascent

Pair with:

Haṭha Yoga Pradīpikā for body-breath technology
The Serpent Power for subtle-body architecture
Vijñāna Bhairava for direct nondual Śaiva recognition
Guhyasamāja for mandalic identity reconstruction
Kālacakra for cosmic-time mapping